How a trip to China helped me grieve the loss of a loved oneFor Hope Talbot, China was the backdrop to learning and understanding how people grieve and commemorate life.
Russian Reindeer circle dance captured by drone cameraRussian Reindeer circle dance captured by drone camera
Tearful witnesses describe being prevented from helping George FloydA Minneapolis firefighter was one of several witnesses who said they wish they could have helped George Floyd.
Bono launches vaccine access campaign with animation series
Youngsters to vote for best film at European Film Academy awardsThe academy is inviting 12 to 16-year-olds to join its international jury, watch three nominated films, and cast their votes in the Young Audience Award.
Ten years in the making, an indie film pays tribute to The Smiths
EU needs 'holistic approach' to tackle racial discriminationA number of anti-racism protests took place over the weekend to mark International Day for the Elimination of Racial Discrimination
Stunning photos of the world's one-colour towns
Dutch-directed 'Shadow Game' offers insight into plight of refugees
The dangers of eco-fascism and why it’s a ‘veneer for racist beliefs’Francisca Rockey on how ordinary people are unknowingly contributing to the growing manifestation of modern eco-fascism.
Iceland: Long-dormant volcano erupts in southwest of islandThe Fagradals Mountain volcano had been dormant for 6,000 years, and the Reykjanes Peninsula hadn't seen an eruption of any volcano for nearly 800 years.
France recommends reserving AstraZeneca vaccine for over 55s
What can we learn from the men seeking gold and friendship in mines
Spain legalises euthanasia and assisted suicide"Today we are a more human, fairer and freer country," said Prime Minister Pedro Sanchez after Spanish lawmakers approved the euthanasia bill on Thursday.
Cartoon Movie, the pitching event raising funds for animated feature filmsCartoon Movie is an annual forum where producers of animated films can meet and find investors and distributors. Animators from all over Europe took part in the event held virtually this year.
Berlin theatre manager quits amid bullying, sexual harassment claimsEmployees have “reported incidents of abuse of power, bullying, verbal violence and sexual harassment.”
'Shadow Game' the big winner at the FIFDH"We have all been there, we all have been young and all experienced the same aspirations that they have" - Els van Driel, the film director of 'Shadow Game' tells all about her award-winning production.
How much does planting trees help to combat climate change?
Oscars: 'Mank' leads nominations for the 93rd Academy AwardsNominations have been announced for #TheOscars following a year which has heavily impacted the movie industry,
Myanmar: Martial law imposed in parts of Yangon as deaths rise
These are Europe's most interesting and beautiful metro stations
Actor brings political message to César film awards
Why criminalising ecocide won’t solve the climate crisis"Prison and criminalisation do not fix harm, they cause it."
Two Black actors crowned Best Newcomers at France's César film AwardsFrance's equivalent to the Oscars crowned Jean-Pascal Zadi and Fathia Youssouf as this year's rising stars during a ceremony at the Olympia on Friday evening.
Why is home swapping becoming such a popular option for holidays?
‘Sadistic and inhumane’ sale of foie gras must be banned in the EUMimi Bekhechi, vice president at PETA UK, gives us her take on foie gras production.
EU rejects claim that European funds financed Lukashenko's 'goldmine'A new documentary film alleges that EU funds contributed to financing Lukashenko's regime and his lavish lifestyle. The bloc has rejected the accusations as "completely unfounded and baseless."
EU nations must provide midwifery care for home births | ViewThroughout Central and Eastern Europe, institutional mechanisms are still being used to hamper midwifery practice, creating conditions where midwifery is possible in theory but not in practice.
Ultraviolet ‘dancing lights’ are enhancing plant growth in fieldsDutch designer Daan Roosegaarde is merging art and tech to help crops grow faster and more sustainably.
The FIFDH kicks off in virtual format for its 19th editionThe International Film Festival and Forum on Human Rights will run from the 5th to the 14th of March in a digital format. This 19th edition is dedicated to photojournalist, Soltan Achilova, and her plight for human rights in Turkmenistan.
'Bad Luck Banging or Loony Porn' wins best film at BerlinaleJudges said the Romanian satirical movie, about a teacher facing scrutiny over a sex tape, "captures on screen the very content and essence, the mind and body, the values and the raw flesh of our present moment in time".
This Greek island has become Europe's first COVID-free destination
Left behind in no man's land: plight of Lesotho's mining families
Buckingham Palace investigating Duchess of Sussex bullying claimsThe revelations come just days before a tell-all interview between Oprah Winfrey and The Duchess and her husband, Prince Harry.
‘Next-generation’ wearable tech turns your body heat into electricitySmartwatches and fitness trackers could soon use your body as a battery.
Austria has failed in fight against corruption, says Council of Europe
'Nomadland,' 'Borat' win at a socially distant Golden GlobesNetflix also won big with 'The Crown' and 'The Queen's Gambit' taking home the award in their respective categories.
Hollywood prepares for virtual 78th instalment of Golden GlobesJudged by members of the international press in the United States, the awards are considered the antechamber of the Oscars.
Pet tiger rescued during Texas freeze is rehomed in sanctuaryA six-month-old tigress, who rescuers have named Elsa, was found in dangerously low temperatures wearing a harness.
Tiger Woods 'fortunate to be alive' after crashing SUV in CaliforniaThe gold star had to be cut free from the wreckage and has undergone surgery for what his agent said were 'serious injuries' to his legs.
Lukashenko 'grateful' for Russian aid as Belarus leader meets Putin"The money hasn't been thrown to the wind," Lukashenko told Putin amid reports he had come to Russia seeking another loan for Belarus.
Debris from US plane falls from sky over Denver homes
Verdi’s Aida with Jonas Kaufmann keeps its magnificence whilst avoiding stereotypes
Two Belarusian journalists jailed for two years for covering protestAndreyeva and Chultsova join the ranks of journalists already prosecuted for their role in covering the ongoing political unrest in Belarus following the disputed presidential elections in August.
Clashes during Spanish protests in support of rap artist Pablo Hasel
UAE a 'lawless country with good PR', says Princess Latifa campaignerPrincess Latifa, the daughter of UAE vice president Sheikha Latifa bint Mohammed Al Maktoum, claims she is being held against her will.
New satirical advert explains why the elite 1% will move to MarsIf you’re not rich enough to escape to Mars, you’d better start tackling climate change now, says Thunberg.
Acquitted filmmaker tells Euronews about the 'huge hole' in MS Estonia
Lockdown love: How has the world been dating during COVID pandemic?
Valentine’s Day in lockdown: Recreate the best European experiences
Take a 360-degree virtual tour of France's food capital
Greek PM Kyriakos Mitsotakis accused of breaking COVID-19 rules again
Objects thrown at Spain's Vox party leader during election campaign
The best travel documentaries, books and podcasts for during lockdown
Kosovo drama 'Hive' wins three awards at Sundance Film FestivalA film about a woman's struggle for survival after the war in Kosovo has won three awards at the Sundance Film Festival.
Oscar winner, ‘Sound of Music’ star Christopher Plummer dies
Has a 50-year mystery about playing golf on the moon now been solved?US astronaut Alan P. Shepard Jr became the first person to hit a golf ball on the moon. But there has been a 50-year-old mystery over how far it travelled. Until perhaps now....
No way forward, no way back: the nightmare of migrants trapped in Bosnia
These are the 6 most romantic cities in EuropeParis isn't the only city for lovers this Valentine's day. What about visiting lesser known Dubrovnik or Verona?
How COVID-19 has caused deadly delays to diagnosing cancer
Watch footage of New York's latest snowstorm
Online make-up tutorials help boost cancer patients' self-esteem during the pandemic
Golden Globes: 3 women nominated for directing as Netflix tops nodsThree women, Emerald Fennell, Chloe Zhao and Regina King, were nominated for best director of a motion picture. Only one woman has previously won the award.
Why Munich is better than DisneylandA tour of all the castles in the German fairytale city.
Scientists have taught spinach to send emails
Swedish nurse becomes Gothenburg Film Festival's only participant"Choosing one single person out of 12,000 was not an easy task, but Lisa made a strong impression on us in her letter," Gothenburg Film Festival CEO Mirja Wester said.
Nurse wins prize to watch films for a week on a remote Swedish islandAn emergency room nurse in Sweden has won a prize to watch films for a week alone in a lighthouse on a remote island.
Catch a shooting star at these awe-inspiring desert retreats
Nearly 33,000 people protest France's global security lawDemonstrators gathered across France but in smaller numbers than in protests that took place in November.
“Dream Big”, how Tony Parker accomplished the impossibleWe speak to world-famous basketball player, Tony Parker, about his successful career in the NBA and his future projects to help today’s youth.
Stop the selfie: Photos with monkeys may be driving illegal pet tradeThe IUCN has issued guidance asking celebrity scientists to stop posing for photos with primates.
Kenyan inventors create bio-robotic arm controlled by brain signals
Documentary makers acquitted of illegally exploring MS Estonia wreck
A closer look at the first island to be Italy’s Capital of Culture
How can the film industry tackle climate change?A new environmental report explains how Hollywood can reduce its carbon footprint.
Police clash with protesters at pro-Navalny demonstrationThousands turned up to support Russia's jailed opposition figure. Police detained hundreds and were filmed hitting protesters.
Italy orders TikTok to block underage users after 10-year-old's death
Russia orders TikTok to restrict calls for Alexei Navalny protests
#MeToo hits Serbia as drama teacher is arrested over rape allegations"After a hard internal struggle, some brave girls and I decided to stand in the way of a dark circle of abuse. We will not give up," said actress Milena Radulovic
Podcast | A dilemma of coming-out in patriarchal societies
Tourists in Bali are being made to do push-ups for not wearing masks
Music producer Phil Spector, who invented 'wall of sound', dies age 81Spector, who revolutionised pop with his "wall of sound" music production formula, was serving a prison sentence for the 2003 murder of Hollywood actress Lana Clarkson.
Biopic film Slalom looks at sexual harassment in sport
Golf isn’t just old white men damaging the planet: A rebuttalWriter and founder of The Club Ryan Curtis responds to last week's op-ed which called for the end of golf.
Drugs, addicts and dealers: an underworld adapting to a pandemicThe COVID-19 pandemic has turned logistics and supply-chains upside down for both legal and illicit trade. In this episode of Unreported Europe, we look at how drug addicts are getting their fix and how dealers are bypassing pandemic restrictions.
Indonesian navy divers find new debris from Sriwijaya Air jetAt least 268 divers were deployed in the search on Thursday.
Meet the youngest male to travel to every country in the world
Brexit: Dutch border guards seize ham sandwiches from lorry drivers
Are you brave enough to ride in the world’s tallest outdoor elevator?
Podcast | The story of when Dakar was the “gay capital” of West Africa
Grammy Awards delayed to March due to COVID-19 pandemic conditionsThe 2021 Grammy Awards will no longer take place this month in Los Angeles and will broadcast in March due to a recent surge in coronavirus cases and deaths.
EU calls for immediate release of over 50 detained Hong Kong activists
US Democrats gain control of Senate with two runoff wins in Georgia
Tanya Roberts has died - a day after her agent's premature statementThe former Bond girl's agent and husband said on Sunday she had passed away in hospital - but corrected the record on Monday when they discovered she was still alive.
Explainer: Who's Julian Assange and why do US want to extradite him?
The best nature experiences along Europe’s iconic waterways
Heavy snow around the world brings joy and challenges
The best of Euronews Living's guest writers in 2020We've rounded up ten of our favourite articles from guest contributors over the last 12 months.
Our top 20 stories from 2020
21 great Greek travel ideas for 2021
Discover the secret Italian islands where overtourism isn't an issue
How loneliness doesn't just affect the elderly but young people too
Lisa Scott-Lee: From Dubai headmistress to life as a popstar
Christmas Eve Jingle: worldwide initiative spreads cheer amid pandemic
The most likely places to get a white Christmas in 2020
Podcast: Listen to every episode of Cry Like a Boy
Getting back to nature in Andalusia
Final goodbye: Recalling influential figures lost in 2020From Ruth Bader Ginsburg to Sean Connery, Euronews recalls some influential figures lost in 2020 and the legacies they left behind.
How 2020 was the year European solidarity was tested
The films in 2020 that battled the pandemic
A look back at COVID-19's impact on European film festivals
Samuel Paty: A murder showing the cracks in European societyThe murder of school teacher, Samuel Paty, at the hands of an Islamist terrorist shocked France. But the repercussions of this crime and how it reflects European society have opened wounds that no one knows how to heal.
Uzbekistan plots its future with the help of the enlightened pastIn an ambitious plan involving hundreds of international scholars, the Republic of Uzbekistan is scouring the world for literary artifacts from the nation’s history.
Jeremy Bulloch, Boba Fett in first 'Star Wars' trilogy, diesBulloch died at a London hospital from health complications after years of living with Parkinson’s disease, his agents at Brown, Simcocks & Andrews said in a statement. He was 75.
Majority of Spanish MPs vote in favour of law allowing euthanasiaThe conservative opposition parties voted against the government's assisted dying bill, with one party claiming the law was "a defeat for everyone, a failure for our health system and our society".
Podcast | What it’s like to be a gay man in Senegal
Duke and Duchess of Sussex launch podcast with multi-year Spotify deal
Oliver Stone says he has taken Russia's COVID-19 vaccineThe US movie director told Russian state TV that he had received the first of two jabs of the Sputnik V vaccine.
'Another Round' wins big at the European Film Awards'Another Round' by director Thomas Vinterberg takes home four of the European Film Awards. The ceremony took place virtually and this year's nominees were connected via video link.
New pro-active effort to keep communities safe from deadly floods
John le Carré, author of 'Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy', dies aged 89John le Carre, who worked for Britain's intelligence service before turning his experience into fiction, has died aged 89.
Riot police arrest dozens at protests against French security law
More than 100 arrested at tense security law protest in ParisRiot police charged protesters in a bid to push them back at a demonstration in Paris against a planned security law that would restrict the publication of pictures showing the faces of police officers.
Who is nominated for best director at the European Film Awards 2020?
Man behind Austria's 'ibizagate' scandal arrested in Germany
An alternative to Hollywood - The film Industry turns to Dubai
British actress Barbara Windsor, star of Carry On films, dies aged 83
European cinema: a taste for everyone's palate
Six in the running to win best movie at European Film Awards
World’s first supersonic fighter pilot Chuck Yeager dies aged 97The first man to fly a plane faster than the speed of sound, Charles “Chuck” Yeagar, has died aged 97.
11 environmental books to buy for the Greta Thunberg in your lifePlus a few recommendations for the newly climate curious.
Couple pedal boat around UK to talk to people tackling climate change
Turkey releases two Russian television journalists after arrests
European Film Awards moves online amid coronavirus pandemic
Two Russian journalists arrested in TurkeyTwo Russian journalists from Russian TV channel NTV were arrested in Istanbul, the channel said.
Nearly 100 arrested during another anti-security law protest in France
Watch: Enormous radio telescope collapses in Puerto Rico
Musica highlights 2020: Puccini's timeless La Boheme
Climate-focused Netflix rival launches today, backed by Prince HarryThe launch of the environmental streaming platform, WaterBear, has also been praised by the likes of BAFTA.
France security bill revision 'welcome', but more work needed says RSF
French government to 'totally rewrite' controversial security measure
Four police officers indicted over Michel Zecler beating in Paris
David Prowse: British actor who played Darth Vader dies aged 85A former weightlifter and bodybuilder, Prowse became a film icon for portraying the imposing physical figure of Vadar in the sci-fi franchise.
Why is France's new national security bill controversial?
France security bill: 62 police injured and 81 arrested at protests
Macron says images of black man's violent arrest 'shame us'
The onscreen lives of Argentine football legend Diego Maradona
Sweden receives request to re-investigate 1994 MS Estonia sinking
Fibreglass shark linked to Jaws movie is installed at new musuemThe shark was rescued from a scrapyard and will go on display at the new Academy Museum of Motion Pictures in Los Angeles.
Romanian documentary about deadly club fire nominated for awardsA documentary about investigative reporting after a nightclub fire in Romania is described as one of the best films ever made about journalism
Killing of black man at supermarket sparks protests across BrazilThe man died after being beaten by supermarket security on the eve of Brazil's annual Black Consciousness Day, sparking angry protests at Carrefour shops across the country.
Nagorno-Karabakh truce: Residents face an uncertain future
French MPs mull criminalising the sharing of police pictures online
Meet the gardeners risking their lives to save Angkor Wat
French coronavirus film gives floor to 'usual suspects of conspiracy'
Wild Mountain Thyme: Film slammed over Irish accents and clichesThe trailer for the new movie Wild Mountain Thyme has come in for criticism for ropey accents and too many cliches.
Activists urge David Attenborough to hand over his Instagram account
Novel ways airlines are giving passengers their travel fix
Trebek remembered for grace that elevated him above TV host“Jeopardy!" host Alex Trebek has died at the age of 80.
El Gouna Film Festival supports MENA films during global pandemic
UAE-produced Saudi soap opera heralds new era for regional TV dramaWatching soap operas is a cherished pastime in many Arab homes.
Egyptian actress & activist Menna Shalaby launches initiative to support female filmmakersAttending this year’s El Gouna Film Festival was celebrated Egyptian actress & women’s rights activist, Menna Shalaby.
How US election misinformation has led to real-world tensions
Blurring the boundaries: will virtual reality take over?There’s a lot more to virtual reality than video games and films; whether streamlining design processes or bringing lessons to life, VR is already enhancing how we live and work. Sci-Tech investigates.
The 14 most Instagrammable ski resorts in Europe
Film about Bosnia takes top prize at El Gouna Film Festival
COVID-19 scares visitors away from Dracula's Castle this Halloween
Scottish actor Sir Sean Connery, who played James Bond, dies aged 90Sean Connery was often cited as the world's favourite James Bond, having played him in several films from the 1960s to the 1980s.
Circular Economy, Pitch Up In The Sky and getting ready for ChristmasOn Euronews' Business Line this month, the Belgian cooperative that transforms waste into desirable designer products, the Dubai event taking elevator pitches to new heights. Plus, the toy companies looking for Christmas salvation.
Massive earthquake brings death and destruction to Turkey and Greece
Cannes ‘mini' film festival ends after 3-day outdoor celebration
Borat 2: Fundraiser for film's 'breakout star' raises over $125,000Jeanise Jones, a grandmother of six, was duped into believing she was babysitting Borat's teenage daughter, Tutar, but ended up giving her some sage advice.
Sisterhood is found at the El Gouna Film FestivalThe fourth edition of the El Gouna Film Festival (GFF) saw the launch of the 'Sisters in Film, Rawiyat' initiative. The Tunisia-Paris based non-profit came as a part of GFF’s mission to support and empower women in Arab cinema.
USA: Unrest in Philadelphia after Black man shot dead by policePolice say officers shot Walter Wallace, 27, when he ignored orders to drop a knife. His family say he was experiencing a mental health crisis.
'Defiant' Cannes Film Festival 2020 begins amid COVID-19 restrictions
El Gouna Film Festival: Short film competition tackles social issues in the MENA regionThe El Gouna Film Festival has officially kicked off, under strict social distancing measures. Amongst the three major prize-winning categories this year’s short film competition incorporates some 18 films, with the top winner claiming the El Gouna Golden Star for Short Film Award accompanied by
The 18-year-old climate campaigner ‘preparing for the worst’Jamie Margolin on planning for the future in the midst of a climate crisis.
Giant inflatable Borat floats down London's Thames
El Gouna Film Festival opens in Egypt despite COVID-19The festival will screen 65 films, including 11 world premieres, and feature multiple workshops and panels.
London's Chinatown is 'over the Moon' about its lantern installation
Ugly fruit, roaming bears, and halting wildfires: meet the EU LIFE Award 2020 winnersLoving ugly fruit, helping roaming bears, and halting Hungarian wildfires: meet the winners of the EU's LIFE Awards 2020
Pope Francis gives landmark endorsement of same-sex civil unions
Barack Obama to hold first in-person event for candidate Joe Biden
Dardenne brothers honoured at forward-looking Lumière FestivalWith the Cannes Film Festival unable to take place physically because of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, Lyon's prestigious  Lumière Festival has assumed even greater significance - honouring the past but also facing the future by featuring forward-looking films. Euronews was there.
Europe’s most spectacular rail journeys
Turkey 'tests' Russian air defence system despite US sanctions threatUS officials had previously told Turkey that the S-400 missiles were incompatible with NATO's own defences
Players, coaches and famous football names get behind Special Olympics ‘Faces of Football’ campaignThese last eight months of pandemic have deprived us of our lives as we knew them, but among all our routine, one might have been hit the hardest: our freedom to move. Athletes were particularly badly hit as training and games were cancelled across the world.
Cinema’s struggle for survival amid coronavirus and Hollywood delays"Another three months and I don't think we'll be able to be rescued," said Tyrone Walker-Hebborn, owner of Genesis, an independent cinema in east London.
'Mission: Impossible 7': US star Tom Cruise spotted at filming in RomeThe Hollywood star and castmate Hayley Atwell were filming on the city's famous Fori Imperiali boulevard, which lies between Piazza Venezia and the Colosseum.
Cinema will survive COVID-19, Lumière festival director says
Donald Trump's doctor says he is ready to return to public events
“Why are you crying? Are you a girl?!” | View
Do environmental documentaries actually change our bad habits?We’re wondering how much effect our binge watching of Blue Planet really has on climate change.
'Don't be afraid,' Trump urges after leaving hospital
Nagorno-Karabakh: Exclusive footage shows bomb damage in border towns
Unclear what live shows will be like after COVID 'plague', says Depp
How did the internet react to David Attenborough's newest documentary?
Trail of Two Oceans - a unique trip across Africa
James Bond: 'No Time To Die' delayed until 2 April 2021The movie is being held back for another seven months to allow it to be seen in cinemas.
The Truffle Hunters: new film laments Italy's disappearing way of life
Sweeping melodies with Jonas Kaufmann at the Summer Night Concert
Can a network of 7000 walking routes transform the way we travel?Hundreds of volunteers have been working to connect footpaths in the UK, but the project could soon be international.
AfD official said migrants ‘could be shot or gassed’ - reports
Inside the rise and fall of Romania's £2.5m book heist gangThey abseiled through skylights to steal some of the world's rarest books. They left DNA at the scene.
Wave of rubbish washes up on normally pristine Honduras beachVolunteers worked to clean up after a wave of rubbish hit Honduras’ Caribbean coast
Bataclan: Film based on surviving terror attack surprise hit of VeniceIsmaël El Iraki's first feature film deals with the themes of trauma, survival and healing.
Actor who played villain in James Bond film Moonraker dies aged 89Lonsdale acted under Orson Welles, Steven Spielberg, Francois Truffaut and Louis Malle.
Belongings of 'The Pianist' Wladyslaw Szpilman up for auctionA fountain pen, silver pocket watch and other prized possessions of the late Jewish-Polish composer Wladyslaw Szpilman go under the hammer in Warsaw next week.
Queen Elizabeth strips Harvey Weinstein of his honorary CBEThe removal of British orders of chivalry occurs when a recipient is considered to have brought the honours system into disrepute.
Europe’s prettiest fairytale towns
Two friends cycle 2,000 km across Europe on a plant-based diet
Paris museum puts on 'mask-and-shoes-only' event for naturists
Documentary aims to raise awareness of troubled climate projectThe documentary Great Green Wall is described as a journey to the front line of the climate crisis.
A third of Kosovo believes coronarvirus is a hoax, according to pollThat is despite the country's healthcare system being at breaking point, with hospital beds filling up with COVID-19 cases and medicine reserves running low.
Game of Thrones and Bond star Dame Diana Rigg dies aged 82 — UK media"She died peacefully early this morning," her agent, Simon Beresford, said in a statement sent to UK media.
Notre-Dame's crypt reopens after 18 months with Victor Hugo exhibition
Orange skies in San Francisco's Bay Area as smoke blocks out the sunSkies were so dark at times that it appeared more night than day.
Hundreds flock to Venice's 'Regata Storica' despite COVID restrictions
Oscar-winning Czech film director Jiri Menzel dies aged 82
Kosovo-Serbia talks resume in Brussels after stateside meeting
'Grief must be witnessed': A time of national mourning for UK COVID-19 victims is overdue ǀ View
A handful of items hold the key to plastic problem, says GreenpeaceBy focusing on a few key products, supermarkets could halve their plastic use by 2025.
Hungarian students blockade university in protest against Orban reformStudents in Hungary are blockading the main entrance of a university over a government reform that has already seen the establishment's management resign in protest.
Why has French judiciary let Charlie Hebdo terrorism trial be filmed?
Khmer Rouge’s chief jailer, guilty of war crimes, dies at 77Kaing Guek Eav, known as Duch, had been serving a life prison term for war crimes and crimes against humanity.
France 2015 terror attacks: Who are the suspects going on trial?
Charlie Hebdo republishes Muhammad cartoons on eve of terror trial
Charlie Hebdo trial: How the terror attacks unfolded five years ago
Hotel Rwanda's real-life hero arrested over 'terrorism' charges“I believe it is a travesty that a human rights champion like Paul Rusesabagina should be captured, detained and held in the way he is being held," said Katrina Lantos Swett, president of the Lantos Foundation for Human Rights and Justice.
Venice film festival: Italy's movie showcase ready to go ahead
'Black Panther' Star Chadwick Boseman dies of cancer
'Black Panther' star Chadwick Boseman dies of cancer at 43
17-year-old arrested after two shot dead at protest in Wisconsin, USA
Why did this grandmother want to get arrested for climate activism?
YouTube star tricks Romanian media into running fake news story
Life after lockdown: how COVID-19 nearly destroyed French Rosé"We lost two months of sales. Up to 50% of our usual turnover," wine producer Jean Simonet told Euronews. His domain, Château Grand Boise, relies mostly on restaurants to buy up its stock.
Danish swimmers occupy North Sea to demand ban on oil explorationThe Greenpeace activists want to prove that Denmark isn't as green as people think.
In Belarus, a family detained and beaten by police is re-united
New documentary exposes 'subhuman' working conditions in LA sweatshops‘Made In America’ takes you on a trip inside Los Angeles clothing factories, to hear the voices of garment workers.
Belarus: Detained protesters 'repeatedly beaten' in state crackdown
Beirut blast survivor speaks of moment his life changed forever
Doing nothing to help Belarus 'is not an option': Lithuanian FM
Belarus: What do we know about the video of Sviatlana Tsikhanouskaya?
Moment of Beirut blast captured on Lebanese bride's wedding video
Cataclysmic explosion sows devastation in Lebanese capital
Romanian film festival pays socially-distanced homage to Federico FelliniThe Transilvania International Film Festival's 19th edition has opened in the city of Cluj-Napoca.
French prosecutors ask for Depardieu rape investigation to be reopened
Europe's week: what big issues are MEPs focussing on in September?
Why is Bollywood star Priyanka Chopra Jonas considering learning Arabic?Aged 18, Indian celebrity Priyanka Chopra was crowned Miss World in the 2000 pageant. It was to mark the start of a glittering career which has since seen her act, sing, write and mentor young performers.
How are Sudan’s youth the driving force behind the country’s film revival?The arrival of president Omar Hassan Ahmad al-Bashir in 1989 brought Sudan's film industry to a crashing halt. Cinema doors were closed for thirty years and filmmakers went underground.
Netflix boycott calls over film deemed offensive to MuslimsThe 2017 Egyptian film Sheikh Jackson was criticised for a scene which shows an imam being disturbed during his prayers in a mosque by a flash mob dancing to Michael Jackson's infamous Thriller choreography.
Plane brilliant! Fly-in film screening held in Poland amid pandemic
Former Malaysian PM found guilty in corruption trialNajib Razak was found guilty on Tuesday in a corruption trial over the looting of the 1MDB investment fund.
'Gone With the Wind' star Olivia de Havilland dies aged 104The actress beloved to millions as the sainted Melanie Wilkes in “Gone With the Wind,” also won two Oscars and was key to improving Hollywood's contract system for actors.
This 100% solar powered ocean pod is reimagining tourism
EU sets aside €1.6bn of financial firepower to reboot arts sector
Netflix 'told to drop gay character' to get Turkey's green light
In photographs: children document life on Turkish-Syrian border
'Everybody watch Earthlings': Zelenskyy defends meeting hostage demand
What’s it really like to film documentaries for David Attenborough?BBC wildlife photographer Bertie Gregory tells us about the environmental responsibility of filming documentaries.
How the UNalab Smart Cities project is regreening overheated Eindhoven
Universal Studios Japan fully reopens after coronavirus restrictions
London policemen sanctioned after 'disturbing' arrest on black man
Rome honours Oscar-winning soundtrack composer Ennio MorriconeThe City Council voted to rename one of its concert halls after Morricone as his soundtrack to the film Once Upon A Time in America was played.
Italian police intercept coffee beans stuffed with cocaineThe package, sent from Colombia, contained 500 beans that had been cut open, stuffed with cocaine powder and carefully fastened closed with dark brown tape.
Three French police officers charged over chokehold deathCedric Chouviat, 42, died after being pinned to the ground by arresting officers. Video footage of the arrest reveal he said "I'm suffocating" at least seven times.
These activists occupy coal mining sites that threaten ancient forestsA documentary is being made which follows their fight.
Banksy painting, stolen from the Bataclan, to be returned to France
Bollywood star Amitabh Bachchan and son in hospital with COVID-19The two members of 'Bollywood's first family' were admitted to hospital in Mumbai as coronavirus cases soar in India.
Living in a bubble: Did this failed 90s experiment predict the future?It's like something straight out of a sci-fi film.
Controversial sculpture of Melania Trump set alight in Slovenia
New transcripts show George Floyd said police were going to 'kill him'
White woman charged in US for calling police on black birdwatcherA white woman who called police on a black man after he asked her to put her dog on a lead in New York's Central Park is facing a criminal charge that is punishable by up to one year in jail.
The Good, the Bad and the Ugly composer Ennio Morricone dies aged 91
Watch: The advert banned in France for ‘creating a climate of anxiety’A Dutch electric bike company has had an ad banned for its negative portrayal of the car industry.
Zac Efron looks for solutions to climate change in new Netflix series
Oscars invite 819 new members including Zendaya, AwkwafinaDiversifying its ranks continues to be a main focus for the film academy, which in 2016 committed to doubling its female and minority membership by 2020.
Brussels police bring defamation case over black MEP's allegations
Starbucks suspends social media ads in effort to tackle "hate speech"
Banksy theft: Six arrested in France over stolen Bataclan painting
Emotions overflow as loved ones reunited through plastic
Analysis: Can Europeans be trusted to follow the post-lockdown rules?The question comes after a makeshift rave in Brussels raised eyebrows in Belgium.
'I'm suffocating': French police probed over delivery driver death
Plastic rains from the sky in some remote parts of the USPlastic pollution in the atmosphere is now being found outside of urban areas.
‘I was very moved’: MEP on applause after racism debate speech
World War II singer and 'forces sweetheart' Dame Vera Lynn dies at 103
Major broadcaster to make all TV shows carbon neutral
Canada indigenous chief battered by policeCanadia Prime Minister Justin Trudeau calls for an independent investigation after an indigenous chief is beaten by police during arrest
EU wants to step up fight to protect children from sexual abuse online
Spanish horror movie crew back on set after two-month virus shutdownActors and the crew must now wear masks and disinfect regularly as they resume filming on 'Vampus Horror Tales'.
Activists and celebrities tell us why nature is important to themFor UNDP's Mission 1.5 campaign, climate-conscious influencers speak up about their dedication to the planet.
Whoopi Goldberg stars in Extinction Rebellion film
'Trump's press demonisation pays off': Attacks on US journalists soar
US police violence: A few bad apples or systemic racism?
#DCblackout: How one hashtag sewed confusion and misinformation
George Floyd: EU foreign policy chief calls death an 'abuse of power'
US protesters defy curfews over George Floyd's death
George Floyd killing: Minnesota to fully mobilize National Guard
Is planting trees the answer to offsetting our Netflix addiction?A new subscription service uses trees to offset users' carbon emissions caused by their streaming habits.
Versailles gets ready to open up the legacy of the Sun King once again
Swarms of desert locusts tear through Rajasthan in northern India
Coronavirus reopens Schengen debate for Romania, Croatia and Bulgaria
Analysis: Why the COVID-19 pandemic shows how civilised we areI think many have been surprised by how compliant and trusting most of us have been around COVID-19 and the lockdowns, writes Euronews' political editor, Darren McCaffrey.
Hungary: 'Critics silenced' in social media arrests as EU mulls powers
Coronavirus is showing yet again why the world needs more strong female decision-makers ǀ View
I love lockdown: meet the Europeans who don't want lockdown to endProblematic, even hideous for some, lockdown has been a blessing in disguise for others.
The deadly impact of COVID-19 on Europe's care homesIn this episode of Unreported Europe Euronews' Valérie Gauriat explores the devastating impact of the coronavirus on the continent's care home sector.
Amnesty slams alleged police brutality in French lockdown enforcement
Employees show us their weird and wonderful zoom set-ups at homeAs more employees than ever try remote working, we look at the environmental benefits and how to make it a success.
'Super-spreaders' of COVID-19 misinformation on Facebook identified
Rare footage captured of brown bear in Spanish national park
French judge to investigate alleged police 'torture' of students
Life after lockdown: Has coronavirus ruined the movie industry?
Europe's secret truck war: drivers pay the price for east-west divide
Cinemas' horror as COVID-19 plot twist leaves them fighting to surviveBut, as the curtain comes down on indoor cinema - in the short-term at least - some are moving outdoors.
In plain view: Drive-in cinema takes off at Vilnius airport
Oscar-winner Emma Thompson stars in new Extinction Rebellion filmThe fictional piece considers the role of ordinary people in environmental activism.
Find out why Poland's pig farmers are concerned about their livelihoods
Unrest, hunger and hardship in France's locked-down suburbs
Children's confinement dance growing in popularity in FranceLucas Elziere, a 35-year-old musician in Rennes, developed the choreography to save his brother's children from boredom.
Creative sector seeks support amid fears over impact of lockdown
Unrest in Paris as residents accuse police of heavy-handed tactics
Why the 50th anniversary of Earth Day is more important than everCampaigners say the current situation could become the "new normal" if we don't take action on the climate crisis.
Hans Zimmer composes a soundtrack for the BMW i4, will Tesla catch up?Why cities of the future might be filled with a quiet cacophony of electric vehicles.
Watch: Boris Johnson thanks NHS after COVID-19 hospitalisation
#StayInYourTent: COVID-19 protective measures reach Sahara DesertSahrawi refugees, who have been living in the middle of the Algerian desert for 45 years, are facing a new kind isolation amid this global pandemic.
How are translations between English and Arabic helping to tackle misinformation?Iraqi students from the University of Mosul are on a mission to share English content with their peers in Arabic.
Majority of coronavirus misinformation 'twists and reworks facts'
Catching infections in premature babies before they happen using AI
The new AI system safeguarding premature babies from infectionResearchers in Rennes are developing a new digital system to detect infections in premature babies and help safeguard them.
Meet the people on the frontlines of the coronavirus pandemic
Hitting the right note: French orchestra plays on despite lockdown
Too close for concert: Stars play from home to raise coronavirus cash
Grammy award-winning Polish composer Krzysztof Penderecki dies at 86Polish culture "has suffered a great and irreparable loss", the country's culture minister said on Sunday.
Coronavirus revealed Trump favours economy over elderly people ǀ View
Europe's front pages as coronavirus cases soar
Five James Bond guns worth over €110,000 stolen in London
Confinement concerto as isolating musicians play Beethoven from home
Bollywood braces for huge losses amid coronavirus lockdownExpensive, elaborate movie sets lie deserted and the filming of dozens of daily TV shows and web series are suspended.
Thinking outside the box: Boy plays on despite COVID-19 confinement
'I'll catch you!': Italian mayors lose patience with lockdown dodgers
Tokyo 2020 Olympics postponed due to the coronavirus outbreak
Coronavirus: Cannes Film Festival postponed due to outbreak
Fish scales could provide sustainable solution for phone screensUsing a material that is usually thrown away, they hope to replace plastics with this biodegradable alternative.
Virtual museums and music streams: Culture for coronavirus confinementBecause this quarantine is going to last a while does not mean you should bid culture goodbye: there’s a world of art, history, and music accessible online.
A modern-day Noah's Ark is being built on South Africa's coastThe world's biggest conservation project to date has ambitions of biblical proportions.
Geneva Human Rights film festival goes ahead via livestream
Harvey Weinstein given 23-year jail term for rape and sexual assaultHarvey Weinstein given 23-year jail term for rape and sexual assault
Human Rights film festival finds alternative in face of Coronavirus threat
This is Europe in 2020, not Orwell’s 1984. The language we use to talk about refugees matters ǀ View
Harry and Meghan to make their final appearance as senior royals"I imagine everybody will be on absolutely best behavior. But goodness knows what they will all be thinking privately," said royal biographer Penny Junor.
Hachette cancels publication of Woody Allen's memoir
SXSW conference canceled amid heightened coronavirus concernsUp until Friday, SXSW had continued to move forward with its plans, adding speakers as recently as this week.
Who are some of Europe's most inspirational female role models?
A bad 'wrap': restoring plastic's reputation
Homophobia hurt Pete Buttigieg — as much as America wished it didn't ǀ View
Iranian film wins top prize at Berlin Film Festival
Women walk out of French 'Oscars' to protest Roman Polanski winThe Paris-based director said the ceremony was turning into a "public lynching."
French actress storms out after controversial Polanski wins award
The predictable disappointments of Netflix's unambitious 'Altered Carbon' ǀ View
Tech workers have drawn a line on Chinese censorship. At Shutterstock, so did the leadership."Employees have a lot of opportunities to work here, to work elsewhere," a company executive said in response to questions about the company's China deal.
La Scala premiers Rossini's Il Turco in Italia
The loss of Caroline Flack has put the impact of online abuse on mental health in sharp focus ǀ View
'Exceptional' black NASA mathematician Katherine Johnson dies at 101Katherine Johnson was eventually portrayed in the 2016 hit film “Hidden Figures,” about pioneering black female aerospace workers.
Katherine Johnson, NASA mathematician depicted in 'Hidden Figures,' dies at 101Johnson "was an American hero and her pioneering legacy will never be forgotten," NASA Administrator Jim Bridenstine wrote on Twitter.
Weinstein guilty of rape: How victims 'changed the course of history'
Investigation continues as injury toll rises in Germany car rammingPolice say the driver was arrested at the scene in Volkmarsen, after around 60 people including children, were injured at Carnival in the German town.
'Just get Mike Bloomberg in there': Clint Eastwood distances himself from TrumpWhile the longtime Republican approves of "certain things" the president has done, he wishes that he would act "in a more genteel way, without tweeting and calling people names."
Trump scoffs at 'Parasite's' historic Oscars win for best picture
Oscar-winning film Parasite has exposed the parasitic lives we all live under capitalism ǀ View
Is playing video games making climate change worse?
Cute videos, but little evidence: Police say Amazon Ring isn't much of a crime fighterHundreds of police departments have signed agreements with Ring to gain access to footage filmed on home surveillance cameras
From Russian with love: Soldier's armoured proposal wins heartsLieutenant Denis Kazantsev led his long-term partner Alexandra Kopytova into the centre as she held her hands over her eyes
'French Oscars' management resigns en masse amid Polanski controversy
What is Scandinavian? SAS airline republish controversial video ad
Is your reusable coffee cup really making a difference?
Brazil: Heavy rains cause floods and mudslide in Sao PauloLocal television stations showed cars covered by water, flooded streets, and kilometres of traffic jams in Sao Paulo in what some called a "chaotic" day.
Technology aiming to transform the lives of people with disabilities
Oscars 2020:  Winners pick up their engraved trophiesBong Joon-ho arrived at the star-studded Governors Ball with six trophies, including best director and best international feature.
Elizabeth Banks slays in same gown as 2004 & other green Oscars looks
Oscars: Parasite first foreign language film in 92 years to win
Final Oscars preparations underway before awards night
‘Enough cream sauce!’: Inside Europe’s coronavirus quarantine centres
The Brief: European cinema faces-off with US industry giantsAhead of the Oscars we take a look at the challenges facing European cinema.
Trump celebrates acquittal, denounces 'vicious' opponents in post-impeachment insult blitzIn rambling remarks, Trump referred to "dirty cops," "leakers," "liars" and "bad people" he blamed for his impeachment.
Antarctica: tower block-sized ice mass smashes into sea
Flowers and wreaths laid on the Hollywood star of Kirk Douglas
1989 news clip unearthed showing the future of homes in 2020
'Dark Waters': Hollywood's warning to EuropeDark Waters tells the real life story of an American lawyer, who takes on one of the world's biggest chemical companies convinced they are knowingly polluting the local drinking water. It’s lead star Mark Ruffalo was in Brussels telling MEPs that he fears that the same could be happening here.
Hollywood legend Kirk Douglas dies at the age of 103
Touzani's 'Adam' looks at the lives of two isolated Moroccan women
Scratching music onto X-rays like bootleggers in Soviet RussiaA couple of music enthusiasts have been reviving a technique for scratching music onto X-rays. It was a method used in the Soviet Union to listen to music like jazz and rock and roll which was banned by the government.
Baftas 2020: Stars criticise lack of diversity in award showFirst World War film 1917 was the big winner on Sunday night. Joaquin Phoenix won best actor for 'Joker' and Renee Zellweger won best actress for 'Judy'.
Berlin Film Festival suspends award amid claims founder had Nazi links
Harvey Weinstein's trial: What happened in Week 2It featured more dramatic testimony and graphic allegations, forcing the former Hollywood mogul to come face-to-face with some of his accusers.
Hillary Clinton isn't running, but she hasn't gone away (even if some might like her to)"Wouldn't we like to run against her?" Trump asked at a campaign rally in Des Moines, Iowa.
'Wuhan is a ghost city': Video reveals life in a coronavirus lockdown
Outrage as Polanski leads Cesar nominations despite rape allegationsFilm director Roman Polanski received 12 Cesar nominations on Wednesday for ‘An Officer and a Spy’ despite facing fresh rape allegations.
20 climate, nature and environment documentaries you must see in 2020
Sweat crystals, cactus leather and sugar cane at Future Fabrics 2020With so many sustainable fabrics now available, why do plastic-based polyesters still manage to dominate the market?
How colour pictures are bringing Auschwitz prisoners to life
Obama called Trump a 'fascist' during phone call, Sen. Kaine says in new Clinton filmThe Va. lawmaker is heard discussing the conversation in 2016 in "Hillary," an upcoming documentary.
What it’s really like to stay at Greece’s most coveted hotelI checked in at Blue Palace resort and spa on Crete's northeastern coast for a luxury mini-break.
Panoramic film photographs of Auschwitz camp tell the story of mass killingLook through the panoramic film photographs of Associated Press's Markus Schreiber taken ahead of Auschwitz liberation 75th anniversary. On Monday hundreds of survivors from across the world will come back to visit Auschwitz for the official commemorations.
My eco job | My life as an undercover animal rights investigator
Monty Python star Terry Jones dies aged 77Jones' wife and three children said they had lost "a kind, funny, warm, creative and truly loving man."
'Two down, four to go': Monty Python star Terry Jones dies aged 77From Oxford to Nazareth and beyond, we look at the life of the writer and historian.
New book recounts reports of Trump attacks on military brass, eagerness to meet PutinThe book, released Tuesday, offers a portrait of Trump's first years in office and reveals new details about previously reported episodes.
Harry and Meghan issue legal warning to media upon arrival in Canada
Titanic wreck to be ‘better protected’ under ‘momentous’ UK-US treatyThe international accord signed by London and Washington allows both governments to control visits to the legendary shipwreck.
Powerful hail storm and major dust storms in AustraliaBad weather brought chaos to parts of Australia, in the form of giant hailstones that pounded the capital Canberra. Wind gusts of 107 kilometers an hour were recorded in Dubbo as the dust storm descended over the town.
Germany jails man for tricking women into electric shocksProsecutors said he persuaded them to attach a homemade contraption to the electricity mains and their extremities while he watched and issued instructions.
Powerful hail storm brings Australian capital, Canberra, to a haltBad weather brought chaos to parts of Australia, in the form of giant hailstones that pounded the capital Canberra. The storm brought down trees, caused flash flooding and inflicted minor injuries on residents.
China to ban plastic bags in major cities by end of 2020The United Nations has identified single-use plastics as one of the world's biggest environmental challenges.
Influential Iranians break ranks with state after Ukrainian jet downing"Apologies for lying to you for 13 years," said one state TV host, announcing on Instagram she was quitting.
Fashion's bad boy Jean Paul Gaultier bids farewell to the catwalk"Be reassured that Gaultier Paris will go on, with a new project which I am the instigator, and that will be revealed to you very soon," he said.
Greta Gerwig and other Oscar snubs show that being a white male is still key to recognition ǀ View
Gladiator of Auschwitz: New film tells the story of Pole who boxed his way through hell
The single-use screens thrown away after 59 secondsThis tech revolution could spell disaster for the environment
Buried in a meteorite, 7 billion-year-old stardust is oldest material found on EarthSome of the ancient grains are billions of years older than our sun.
Details of Prince Harry and Meghan's new life are far from settled"These are complex matters for my family to resolve, and there is some more work to be done," said the queen in a statement on Monday.
Spike Lee ‘honoured’ to lead jury of this year’s Cannes Film FestivalThe filmmaker said he was ‘honoured’ to be chosen as President of the Jury at Cannes, two years after his movie BlacKkKlansman won the prestigious Grand Prix award at the festival.
I explored the eco-side to Puerto Vallarta, on Mexico's Pacific Coast
Iranian protesters refuse to trample on U.S. and Israeli flags"Iranian protesters are likely very aware that the Iranian regime uses legitimate grievances against the United States and Israel to deflect criticism."
Oscars 2020: Joker, the Irishman and Parasite nominated
Iranian police fire tear gas and live rounds against protesters
Senior royals to meet after Prince Harry and Meghan's bombshell announcement"This bombshell had been dropped on the royal family and yet they still hadn't met to discuss it face to face," said NBC royal contributor Camilla Tominey.
Europe urges Iran to keep nuclear deal as protesters defy regime
From infotainment to helicopter cabs, the auto industry is flying high at Consumer Electronics ShowBefore you even step inside, one "smart" car will set your seat to the right position, turn on your favorite tunes, and program the GPS for your next destination.
It's 'complicated': Royal surprise as Harry and Meghan 'step back'
What is this award season's biggest unexpected trend?We are one ceremony down and already things are looking greener than ever before.
Why is China raising the prospect of same-sex marriage?
How those of us in "Generation Z+" are facing the challenge of digital ageism ǀ View
Weinstein charged with rape in LA as separate rape trial starts in NYC
Marvel Universe to get its first ever transgender superheroThe Disney-owned studio is having a massive push on diversity and representation with its upcoming films.
How our phones became our whole lives in just 10 years, from a woman who resuscitates them ǀ View
Film in 2019: The Joker gets the last laugh
Boozy marathons: can running and drinking alcohol really be healthy?Wine and cheese go together, but wine and running is not such a common pairing. The only way to understand it, is to be part of it.
10 stories that changed Europe in the last decade
How Netflix, Star Wars and Marvel redefined Hollywood ǀ View
Tom Hanks receives honorary Greek citizenshipThe 63-year-old actor has produced a number of films in the country and often spends his holidays on the Greek island of Antiparos.
8 shot in music video 'ambush' near HoustonInvestigators believe a group of men were shooting the video in a parking lot when gunmen opened fire.
Trump fans upset Canada cut president's 'Home Alone 2' cameo"These edits were done in 2014, when we first acquired the film and before Mr. Trump was elected president," a network spokesman said
Pomp, politics & prayers as world leaders offer their Christmas wisdom
Queen and her heirs bake festive treats togetherBritain's Queen Elizabeth and her heirs spent time baking festive treats together in the run-up to Christmas.
Priest on wheels scoots out of Christmas Eve mass
AI from Google is helping identify animals deep in the rainforestThe technology could help scientists sort through millions of images of elusive endangered species.
Watch again: Queen delivers Christmas message after 'bumpy' 2019Health scares, embarrassments and political turmoil - 'bumpy' may be an understatement but the Queen is also keen to celebrate the spirit of D-Day in her Christmas message to the Commonwealth.
They may be royal, but the queen's family had its own share of troubles this yearFrom an alleged rift between Princes William and Harry to a scandal around Prince Andrew, negative headlines have become the norm for the queen's family.
Females make significant gains in European film2019 was the year for women in European cinema. From female directors, to issues of gender inequality
China’s tourist hotspot takes its place on the international stageSanya is growing as a destination for events, conferences and exhibitions, with investment in the sector bringing world-class facilities and thousands of new visitors.
Russian security officer dead, five injured in shooting at Moscow headquarters of security agency
The biggest climate, environment and sustainability stories of 2019
Star Wars fans out in force for 'The Rise of Skywalker''The Rise of Skywalker' concludes the so-called "Skywalker saga" of films begun by George Lucas in 1977.
Protests turn violent for second day in Lebanon's capitalThe tension reflects deepening divisions in the country that is grappling with a severe liquidity and foreign currency crunch.
What flying a helicopter over London taught me about the film industryEver wondered how they make Marvel movies? I got a birds eye perspective.
Actress Anna Karina diesAnna Karina, the epitome of French New Wave cinema, has died of cancer at the age of 79. The French-Danish star was the former muse of film director Jean-Luc Godard
French actress Juliette Binoche celebrated at European Film AwardsShe has starred in the films such as Chocolat, Three Colors: Blue and The English Patient. Now Juliette Binoche has been recognised for her impressive back catalogue.
East Dunbartonshire or bust: Seeing the decline of Jo SwinsonReporting from the now former Lib Dem leader's constituency was a gamble, but sadly for Swinson, it became the story she never wanted.
LinkedIn focuses on freelancers and SMEs as worldwide membership soarsLinkedIn has launched a new service allowing SMEs and freelancers to represent the services they offer on their profiles.
Johnson and Corbyn in late push for votes ahead of pivotal election
King Kong, ET and the Alien on display at Carlo Rambaldi exhibition
'Getting Brexit done is going to take decades' says Jonathan Coe
The Favourite lives up to its name at European cinema's night of nightsIt was the clear winner at the European Film Awards in Berlin, picking up a total of eight awards, including Best Film and Best Director for Yorgos Lanthimos.
Santa on his bench: Banksy highlights homelessness with new artwork
Tourists film New Zealand volcano eruption from nearby boat
Apple lands first Golden Globe nominations; Netflix leads fieldStreaming services including Apple TV+, Netflix and Amazon Prime nets many of the nominations for both TV shows and films.
Gunman who killed 3 at U.S. Navy base watched mass-shooting videosThe shooter was at a dinner prior to Friday's rampage at which mass-shooting videos were viewed, an official said.
What’s it like to be a blind voice-over artist? Amal Al Mansouri tells her storyThirty-one-year-old Emirati, Amal Al Mansouri is a struggling artist of a different kind.
UK election: What’s the state of play with a week to go?
WATCH | Tackling climate change in 60 seconds or less
Films tipped to win 2019 European Film Awards
Trump slams Trudeau as 'two-faced' over video apparently mocking himUS President Donald Trump slammed Justin Trudeau as “two-faced” after a video emerged showing the Canadian Prime Minister and other world leaders apparently mocking him.
SME Assembly - sustainability tops the agendaDelegates set out to understand if companies betting on 'green' growth are making the right choice, what kind of support and funding is available and what challenges do they face
Frozen 2’s eco message overshadowed by sale of plastic toysDisney has been criticised for selling plastic merchandise following the release of the second Frozen film.
Prince Andrew's accuser asks to be believed in first U.K. interview"This is a story of being trafficked. This is a story of abuse and this is a story of your guys' royalty," Virginia Roberts Giuffre is quoted as saying.
Hungarian rapper calls for climate action in his latest hit
Rome | Finding wellness in the Eternal City at Dedica Anthology HotelTravelling to Rome was like stepping straight into the 1950s film, Roman Holiday, Vespas and all...
Eyewitness says man used narwhal tusk to confront terrorist suspect
K-pop stars get prison terms for sexual crimesA South Korean court found two stars, Jung Joon-young and Choi Jong-hoon, guilty of illicit sexual relations with a woman.
Black Friday Amazon deals' costs: Workers' health, climate change and your own taxes ǀ View
'We must denounce patriarchy in Europe,' says award-winning directorThe tale of a woman standing up to patriarchy in a small Macedonian village has won the prestigious LUX Film Prize. Its director says it is important to stand up to misogyny in the Balkans and across Europe.
La Mer: inside Dubai’s top beach locationHere’s how to spend a full day at one of the city’s most popular seaside spots
Cara Delevingne and Kate Moss in star-studded campaign to save oceanIn the Project Zero video, celebrities talk about the important role the ocean plays in fighting climate change.
The enduring power of the hunger strike ǀ View
Cleanup after Albania experiences five quakes in two days
'Unimaginable' loss after heist at world-renowned museum in Dresden"Not only the state art collections were robbed, but we Saxons," tweeted the prime minister of Saxony.
Boris Johnson may just have met his match: the voting public.The test for the Johnson, who is fighting his first election as prime minister, is how he acts when the laughter stops.
These Eco-Visionaries are using AI to recreate near-extinct animalsDystopian evolution and novel solution a presented side by side at The Royal Academy of the Arts
'France's shame': Thousands protest in Paris against domestic violence
Plane makes emergency landing after flames burst from engineObservers filmed smoke and flames coming from the right engine of a Philippines Airlines flight after takeoff.
73 cows | The BAFTA winning short film that will move you to tearsAlex Lockwood's masterpiece on the dark reality of beef farming deserves to be watched.
Here’s how tolerance is reshaping mindsets in the MENA regionTolerance holds different meanings for different people.
F1 team realises the challenge of changing tyres in weightlessnessRed Bull carried out a pit stop in the weightless conditions of Zero-G.
#MovieMoney: French police warn of fake bank notes in circulation
'Every society' has violence against women, expert says
Innovation, tradition, pop culture: Osaka embodies the Japanese spirit
'J'accuse' screenings cancelled after anti-Polanski protest
Nikita Vlasov wins top prize at the Russian Outdoor Film FestivalVlasov was awarded €21,000 and said he will use it to produce his next film.
Boris versus Binface: The barmy battles in Britain's 'Brexit election'If you thought British politics couldn't get any more surreal, a glance at this list of constituency clashes should make you think again.
How to take plastic out of your decorationsIt takes just a few small steps to make big changes, and you can try it this Christmas.
China's Xi calls Hong Kong unrest 'urgent' in rare comment on protestsRecent violent demonstrations in the semi-autonomous region pose one of the most serious challenges to the president since he came to power in 2012.
Stars promote new film 'Last Christmas' in central LondonThe stars and director of new film "Last Christmas" helped light up festive decorations in central London's fashionable shopping district Covent Garden on Tuesday (November 12).
Roger Stone will not testify as his criminal trial nears an endStone, 67, could face prison time if convicted in the trial.
Hong Kong police shoot protester as chaos erupts across cityHong Kong police shot and wounded one protester on Monday, who, hospital officials said, was in critical condition, as the Chinese-ruled territory spiralled into rare working-hours violence in its 24th straight week of pro-democracy unrest.
Woody Allen settles $68 million suit against Amazon
At least 25 arrested after clashes at gay movie premiere in GeorgiaPolice arrested more than 25 people after ultra-nationalist protesters attempted to derail the premiere of an award-winning movie about gay love.
Racism in football: Are Italy's Ultras the problem or the solution?
#metoo hits French cinema as actress Adele Haenel accuses director
Catherine Deneuve, 76, in Paris hospital after 'limited' strokeFrench actress Catherine Deneuve has been hospitalised in Paris after suffering a "reversible" stroke, her family told AFP.
Hong Kong official deeply regrets civil servants taking part in protestsHong Kong official deeply regrets civil servants taking part in protests
5 ways to have a more eco-friendly Bonfire NightFireworks might be pretty but they can have a unexpected environmental impact.
Tiny, privately owned satellites are changing how we view the EarthIn one year, Planet Labs built as many satellites as the rest of the world combined. Its images are used by governments, researchers, and even farmers.
WATCH | Protesting fast fashion almost made me fail my master'sLaura Karup made the bold decision not to present a final collection for her Masters of Fashion.
'We're somewhere between an erotic date night and a sex party'Immersive theatre group House of Kittens has a new show, and it would make a great couples' night out.
Protesters of the world: think twice before putting on that Joker maskJoker masks and make-up have been used as a symbol by protesters around the World since the release of Todd Phillips' blockbuster. But is the character played by Joaquin Phoenix a far cry from an idealist freedom fighter.
Greta Thunberg declines award: The movement doesn't need 'more prizes'
9 pieces of vintage furniture to redecorate your home during lockdown
Key West hosts fantasy parade during 10-day costume and mask festivalDisco queens and over-the-top salutes to musical icons entertained revellers during Saturday night's Fantasy Fest Parade, the highlight of Key West's 10-day costuming and masking festival that ends Sunday.
Carnival held to mark Mexican Day of the DeadThousands of people took to the streets of Mexico City to dance beside giant skulls and skeletons, rolled out for the capital fourth edition of a Day of the Dead parade inspired by Hollywood, part of an ever-expanding menu of festivities for the holiday.
Protesters form human chain across Lebanon
Check out this festival screening green films across the UKThe line up for this year's UK Green Film Festival features topics from animal extinction to landfill waste.
Oscar winner Lina Wertmüller: 'Women have power'
These Europeans are sick of hearing about Britain's Brexit chaos"Either they want to stay or they want to leave, which is it?" said one person in Brussels this week.
Protests in Iraq find an outlet to the world: SnapchatNBC News was able to view hundreds of videos coming in from cities across Iraq documenting the entire day of demonstrations via Snapchat's interactive heatmap.
How virtual reality is helping seniors breathe new life into old memoriesNew systems let users reconnect virtually with people, places and events from their youth.
Filmmaker Ken Loach talks about realistic filmmaking in Lyon
Lazio fans filmed making Nazi salutes on streets of Glasgow
Lebanon ex-minister urges election to 'get rid' of government
Appeals court to hear showdown over Trump taxesThe U.S. 2nd Circuit Court of Appeals is hearing the case on a fast track, and lawyers for both sides have agreed to seek immediate review from the Supreme Court.
Godfather director Francis Ford Coppola praised as he wins Lumière AwardThe US filmmaker is honoured at a ceremony in Lyon and takes the director's chair to remake an 1895 classic
Danes try to move 120-year-old lighthouse from eroding coastWhen the 76-feet-tall lighthouse in Denmark was first lit in 1900, it was roughly 656 feet from the North Sea; now it is only about 20 feet away.
New 'Star Wars: The Rise of Skywalker' trailer arrives on Carrie Fisher's birthdayThe latest film in the blockbuster Disney franchise, set for release in December, will feature the last footage Fisher filmed before her death in 2016.
5 eco accessories that will transform your homeBrands leading the way in luxury ethical homeware.
Electric tricycle causing a spin with those with impaired mobilityNew electric tricycles that resemble Roman chariots have begun appearing in France. They are calling the vehicle, the Benur and it's already causing a sensation for those with impaired mobility.
Police raid Joker screenings in Athens, turfing out 19 children
The home of Downton Abbey is on Airbnb
Francis Ford Coppola lights up Lyon's Lumiere Film FestivalCult US filmmaker Francis Ford Coppola  has received the prestigious Lumière Award at the Lumière festival, which ends on Sunday in Lyon.
Sons of Polish navigator united with family who hid their fatherSons of Polish navigator united with family who hid their father in Nazi-occupied France
As plans for the UK's first spaceport take shape, opposition growsTrekking through the muddy peat bog on the A'Mhoine peninsula on the remote north coast of Scotland, it seems hard to imagine that within a couple of years, that this remote, beautiful, wetland landscape could be the UK's first spaceport, launching small satellites into the lucrative polar orbit.
Distressing footage: Animal cruelty activist films undercover at lab
Malaysia orders cuts to 'Abominable' movie over controversial map sceneThe map in the animated film depicts the so-called "nine-dash line," a contested area of the South China Sea.
Would you enjoy a nice cold beer if the bottle was made from paper?Beer brand Carlsberg has just announced its most sustainable bottle design yet.
Behind a violent Trump meme, a prolific creator and and a community rooting for moreAs pro-Trump digital creator communities have grown, they've found traction with people close to Trump and even the president himself.
Frances McDormand kicks off Lumière film festival in LyonThe Lumière film festival opened in Lyon today. Film director, Francis Ford Coppola has won the main award.
Robert Forster, actor nominated for Oscar for Jackie Brown, dies at 78He said in 2018 that regardless of the ups and downs of a career, "the job of real life is the job of caring for others".
Expo 2020: A year to go
Blustering gustnado in Thailand picks up roofs and signsResidents captured the startling moments when a gustnado - a swirling wind caused by storm clouds - was seen in Samutprakan province
Moviegoers call for Joker 'boycott' over use of Gary Glitter song
Vladimir Putin celebrates 67th birthday in Siberian mountainsRussian President went for a walk in the Siberian taiga and climbed a mountain ahead of his birthday on Monday
We met the winner of the world's largest sustainable fashion awardFounder of Redress, Christina Dean, tells us about the organisation's Fashion award and how it hopes to shape the future.
Thousands defy anti-mask law at Hong Kong marchTens of thousands of protesters marched through central Hong Kong on Sunday wearing face masks in defiance of colonial-era emergency powers which threaten them with a year in prison for hiding their faces.
Martin Scorcese says Marvel movies are 'not cinema'"Guardians of the Galaxy" director James Gunn said he was "saddened" by the filmmaker's comments.
Action man Steven Seagal & actress Hend Sabry attend El Gouna Film FestivalDuring the 9-day run of Egypt’s 3rd edition of the El Gouna Film Festival, Hollywood actors rubbed shoulders with regional movie stars.
What were the highlights of El Gouna Film Festival’s third edition?The third edition of the El Gouna Film Festival came to a close on September 27.
Can MENA horror films go mainstream? Yes, says Emirati filmmakerThe genre of horror has not been much explored by filmmakers in the Middle East and North Africa to date, nor achieved mainstream success.
A RoboCop, a park and a fight: How expectations about robots are clashing with realityWhen Cogo Guebara pressed a button on a robot to call the police, she was instead instructed to "step out of the way."
Michael Avenatti wants Stormy Daniels' money from Ohio strip club settlementAvenatti, who represented the adult film actress in lawsuits against Trump, says Daniels owes him more than $2,000,000 for legal services and expenses.
Trump's Nickelback meme gets taken off Twitter for copyright violationTrump's Wednesday night tweet riffed on a popular meme where users replace the photograph the band's lead singer holds in a music video.
Eagle flight footage to show Europe glacier reduction
DOJ joins Trump lawsuit seeking to block release of his tax returnsThe Manhattan District Attorney's Office is seeking the financial records as part of a probe into hush money payments to two women claiming affairs with Trump.
Gender equality in the new commission
Ukraine's comedian-turned-president meets Hollywood royalty, Tom Cruise
IAAF restrict 'creepy' cameras after complaints from female athletesThe IAAF has installed cameras into starting blocks to capture the moments leading up to the starting pistol, but athletes say such an angle is "unpleasant".
London Film Festival is back, and it’s no longer white
New exoskeleton to beat low back pain
El Gouna Film Festival: Looks from the red carpet
On Twitch, women who stream say their biggest obstacle is harassment"There's definitely days where I'm like, 'I can't even stream because there's so much mean stuff,'" said Lisa Vannatta, who goes by STPeach on the site.
A teen's fatal stabbing was filmed: Is social media to blame?"We see these terrible stories, and they are terrible, and we all immediately wonder, if this were happening to me, would people come to my aid?" one media expert said.
Turner Prize nominees focus on issues beyond BrexitFour shortlisted entries focus on the inequalities and injustices of a globalised world still capable of producing horrific conflicts.
Finland: Northern Lights dance in the night skyStriking green, purple and white, aurora displays lit up the night sky over Finnish Lapland from Friday to Saturday
Winners of Egypt's El Gouna Film Festival revealed
El Gouna Film Festival: Give Up The Ghost wins Best Arab Short Film
El Gouna Film Festival: Palestinian filmmaker Mai Masri shares her experience
Exclusive: Europe’s Children of ISIS
A family’s experience of war inspires Kosovo’s entry for the Oscars
Ten things to know about Sunday's snap general election in Austria
Drone helps filmmaker rescue pets stranded in the Bahamas after Hurricane Dorian"[It] still blows me away how these animals survive," Doug Thron said. "Their will to survive is pretty strong."
French #MeToo: Government advisor 'optimistic' despite Muller ruling
Court rules trans man who gave birth cannot be registered as father
El Gouna Film Festival: How to get a film seen around the world
Ibiza-gate - Austria's political hurricane
Drone images show damage one year after Indonesia earthquake, tsunami
French #MeToo founder to pay damages for defamationA Paris court ordered Sandra Muller to pay €15,000 in damages to a TV executive Eric Brion who she had accused of making sexually lewd remarks at a party.
Federal judge holds off on deciding if "The Godfather" film scene can be played at Roger Stone trialStone's defense team has argued it would be prejudicial to show the scene because it would liken their client to the mafia.
Anchors away: Cannes bans cruise ships over air quality concerns
Trump lawyers, Manhattan DA spar over release of Trump's tax returnsThe case centers on the Manhattan District Attorney's Office probe of Trump's involvement in hush-money payments to two women claiming affairs with him.
Egypt’s first animated feature took 20 years to make
Five key points from day two of this year's United Nations
How anti-vaxxers target grieving moms and turn them into crusadersAnti-vaccine advocates find women whose babies have died unexpectedly and convince them vaccines are to blame.
'Giuliani took Fredo to the cleaners': Trump trashes CNN's Cuomo during UN remarksCuomo sparred with Trump's attorney Rudy Giuliani last week in an interview that devolved into a shouting match.
Man drowns proposing to his girlfriend during idyllic getaway"We never got to embrace and celebrate the beginning of the rest of our lives together, as the best day of our lives turned into the worst, in the cruellest twist of fate imaginable," Kenesha Antoine wrote on Facebook following the death of her boyfriend.
Change in narrative: how can film play a part in refugee crises?
Did you miss the Emmy Awards? Here's a look at the best moments.The host-free ceremony largely avoided topical gags, focusing on what one presenter called the 'platinum age' of TV. Here's a look at five key moments.
I was enchanted by the car-free Greek island of SpetsesNavigable by electric bike, this historic island is full of charm, from its picturesque Old Harbour to hidden beaches where pines reach the water.
Iconic Orient Express showcased in Lyon for European Heritage DaysJosephine Baker, Mata Hari, and the Belgian king were a few of the celebrities that travelled on the luxury train.
The Gen Xers on 'Friends' ruined the real world for millennials ǀ View
Deny, divert, discredit: Trump turns to his scandal playbook once againAnalysis: The president has a canned approach for trying to fend off bad news. This time it's a whistleblower report.
El Gouna Film Festival opens in Egypt
Young man sentenced to three years in prison for making 3D printed gun“I hope that today’s sentencing sends a very clear and powerful message that we will prosecute anyone who thinks that they can get away with being in possession of, or manufacturing a firearm, in London,” Detective Sergeant Jonathan Roberts said.
Watch: Stormtrooper helmet and Holy Hand Grenade up for auction
Game of Thrones tapestry exhibition draws huge crowds in FranceThe tapestry was made with the same material used to make the costumes for the show.
American cancer survivor swims the English channel four times non-stop"I've been waiting for this swim for over two years now and have fought so hard to get here," wrote Sara Thomas on Facebook before setting off.
Manhattan DA subpoenas Trump's tax returns in probe of hush money paymentsCongressional Democrats had already subpoenaed six years' worth of records, but their case is tied up in court.
Francis Ford Coppola dismayed he may have inspired Boris JohnsonCoppola said he felt bad his movie had seemingly given "encouragement to someone I see is about to bring the beloved United Kingdom to ruin."
Francis Ford Coppola dismayed he may have inspired Boris Johnson
Car chases and stunts as James Bond crew settles into Matera
Russian theatre director has house arrest conditions lifted by court
Jodorowski's latest documentary explores 'psychomagic' and healingThe avant-garde film maker has developed an alternative form of healing by freeing the subconscious through his art.
Undersea explorer becomes the first to reach deepest point of all five oceansVictor Vescovo achieved the feat by diving to the bottom of the Molloy Deep, a frigid trench 170 miles west of Svalbard, Norway.
Materadio brings radio broadcasting to the stageAs part of its ongoing celebrations as European Capital of Culture, the Italian city of Matera is to host three days of live programming from state radio channel Rai Radio 3 between 11 and 15 September.
5 incredible eco-resorts helping to save endangered animals
One of Antarctica's most unstable glaciers may be thinning faster than previously thoughtThe disturbing conclusion comes from a new look at vintage film from an aerial survey of the icy continent from the 1970s.
Watch: Polish officers smash windows of Greenpeace ship with hammersMasked men, armed with automatic weapons, break the windows of the Rainbow Warrior vessel.
'Here we go again': Young Americans turn to memes, dark humor in face of recession"A lot of us are in a lot of college debt, jobs are hard to get," said one young person who posted to Twitter about a possible recession.
Congress returns with guns, Trump probes and spending bills on its plateLawmakers haven't left themselves much time: The House is scheduled to be in session for only 45 days through the end of the year.
Climate change protesters occupy the red carpet at the Venice Film Festival
'Joker' wins Golden Lion at Venice Film Festival
Climate change activists storm red carpet at Venice Film FestivalSeveral hundred demonstrators took over the red carpet at the event where Hollywood stars such as Brad Pitt, Scarlett Johansson and Joaquin Phoenix have premiered their latest films.
Johnny Depp promotes "Waiting for the Barbarians" at Venice Film FestivalIn it Depp plays a cold and cruel officer which his director says may be set in a faraway desert outpost but is relevant to today's world.
Watch: Aurora borealis light up Antarctic sky and ice
First-ever movie in Slavic Esperanto premieres at Venice festival
New theory in the never-ending search for the Loch Ness monster: a really big eelWhile the legend of the Loch Ness monster goes back hundreds of years, the first modern sighting of Nessie was reported in 1933.
Face-swapping app takes off in China, making AI-powered deepfakes for everyone
German fashion photographer Peter Lindbergh dies, aged 74
161 mph Taycan revealed as Porsche's first electric carFours years on from the Mission E concept, Porsche’s first EV is now ready to go on sale
House Democrats to hold hearings on Stormy Daniels hush-money caseDemocrats are highlighting a case in which they believe prosecutors would have enough evidence to charge Trump with a crime if not for Justice Department policy.
Kashmir: The misinformation spreading online | #TheCube
The pros and cons of the booming rental fashion industryPeople are starting to rent their clothes instead of buying them. Is there a future for the industry claiming to be the ‘Airbnb of fashion’?
'Please pray for us,' begs mother sheltering from Hurricane Dorian
This week's best no comments: Film, food fights & the best whistlersHere are some of our best no comment videos from this week.
Ukraine-Russia prisoner swap 'close' after release of MH17 suspect
Almodovar gets lifetime achievement award at Venice Film FestivalPedro Almodovar greeted his fans in Venice before receiving Golden Lion award
Explained: The story of Paris' liberation from the Nazis, 75 years on
My eco-job: I run a coral nursery in the MaldivesCoral biologist Megan Clampitt tells us all about her job protecting the Indian ocean’s vital coral reefs.
Calls for 'upskirting' to be made illegal in Germany
Elephants saved after getting stuck in muddy pond
A battle over high-tech crime-fighting is dividing one of America's most dangerous citiesDetroit's police chief says facial recognition is making the city safer. Some residents fear it could create a surveillance state.
James Bond movie gets a title: 'No Time to Die'Producers say the film will see Bond enjoying a tranquil life in Jamaica after leaving active service before an old friend asks for help.
YouTube star PewDiePie announces marriage to long-term girlfriend"I'm the happiest I can be," Kjellberg tweeted. "I'm so lucky to share my life with this amazing woman."
Strong winds blow dozens of air mattresses through US park
Mattress mayhem as strong winds disrupt open-air cinema eventDozens of mattresses set up for an event called 'The Bed Cinema' get blown across a park in Denver.
Virtual reality Star Wars experience opens in New York shopping mall
Easy Rider actor and writer Peter Fonda dies aged 79Actor Peter Fonda, who played a leading role in 1969 film Easy Rider, dies aged 79, his family said in a statement.
The Brief: Sarajevo Film festival celebrates 25 yearsThe Brief: Sarajevo Film festival celebrates 25 years - remembering its roots in conflict but expanding horizons
Watch: Our best No Comment videos of the week
Woodstock fifty years on: legacy celebrated despite lack of official anniversary eventFifty years ago, the landmark Woodstock Festival was taking place in upstate New York. No official anniversary eventis taking place, but its legacy is commemorated in various ways including a new documentary.
Peterloo Massacre remembered 200 years onThe bicentenary of one of Britain’s bloodiest political rallies will be marked in Manchester with events in memory of the Peterloo Massacre.
Knife crime campaign on fried chicken boxes branded 'offensive'A government knife crime campaign on fried chicken boxes has been condemned as 'ignorant' and 'offensive'.
Hair today, gone tomorrow: stylist creates portraits with cuttings
London Design Festival: the sustainability events you can't missThis year the festival will feature a strong focus on the potential for design to help solve current global concerns around biodiversity, sustainability, and the crisis of single use plastics.
Met police officer facing the sack after appearing Big Brother Nigeria
What the Venice Biennale can teach us about climate change
Wildfire rages through forest in Spain's Canary IslandsVideo footage shows a wildfire burning through the hills near Juncalillo on the island of Gran Canaria.
Tornadoes and 'whirlwinds' cause havoc in parts of northern Europe
A Wildlife Photographer shows us the personality and plight of animalsGraeme Purdy explains to us how he's spent years capturing wildlife but in his latest project, from only eight feet away.
Galaxy Note 10: Five takeaways from Samsung's new smartphone launch
Toni Morrison was a freedom fighter who slayed with words ǀ View
British Airways plane evacuated after cabin fills with smokeA British Airways plane had to be evacuated after landing in Valencia, Spain, because the cabin filled with smoke.
Heated debate has always been part of British politics. Brexit has made it angrier.Analysis: "The way both sides talk about each other — each month it gets more and more polarized," one expert said.
Pro- and anti-Tommy Robinson protests to be held in London
Co-founder of Atari, Nolan Bushnell launches new gameBeing the co-founder of Atari, and the inventor of the smash-hit 1970’s arcade game Pong, earned Nolan Bushnell the nickname of, “the father of video-gaming”.
Five visuals to sum up Greenland's exceptional ice melting & wildfires
From jets to yachts: Is Google's climate change camp hypocritical?The most exclusive event on the A-list calendar centred around environmental concerns this year. But were they missing something?
Floodwaters soak local bus on New York's Staten IslandPassengers seated on the bus had to lift up their legs or stand on seats to avoid getting wet.
Netflix's star-studded 'The Irishman' is one of 2019's most important movies ǀ View
50 years after the moon landing Matera honours the Apollo 11 mission
When Cardi B met Bernie: The rapper and Sanders talk 'future of America'Cardi said earlier this month that she had been reading about Sanders and was "really sad how we let him down in 2016."
007 Aston Martin sold at auction
007 Aston Martin sold at auctionThe classic Aston Martin DB5 driven by James Bond in the film Goldfinger has been auctioned in California for 5.77m euros
EU seeks countries to take in migrants stranded at Italian port
Shark Week is entertainment, some experts worry it focuses too much on the sensationalAs the 31st installment is set to debut, Discovery finds not all biologists and conservationists are on board its programming strategy.
How TikTok became the music discovery platform for the smartphone generationTikTok now shows up on YouTube, Spotify and Apple Music, where TikTok-focused playlists have tens of thousands of followers.
'Once Upon a Time in Hollywood' marks Bruce Lee's posthumous comebackThe martial arts legend wasn't fully appreciated by Hollywood in his day, but a new generation of actors like Mike Moh give thanks to his legacy.
Record breaking Egyptian mountaineer Omar Samra talks triumphs and tragedySixteen years ago, Egyptian adventurer Omar Samra turned his back on a successful career in finance to pursue his love of the great outdoors.
Licence To Buy: One of James Bond's Aston Martin DB5s up for sale
London Comic-Con kicks off with new Star Wars Zone
Why Tim Cook dropped $1 billion on Intel's modem chipsByers Market is a daily newsletter from NBC News senior media reporter Dylan Byers that takes you behind the scenes in Hollywood, Silicon Valley, New York and Washington.
Controversy to play supporting role at the 76th Venice Film Festival
Bear steals bin from Colorado marijuana dispensaryA surveillance camera filmed a bear attempting to take and open a trash bin at a Colorado marijuana dispensary.
How to have a flying free holiday and reconnect with natureWe investigate why no-fly holidays in the countryside are good for the planet and your mental health.
Watch: Tour de France employs men to redesign the phallic graffiti
Apple's Intel play and Leo DiCaprio's enduring prestigeByers Market is a daily newsletter from NBC News senior media reporter Dylan Byers that takes you behind the scenes in Hollywood, Silicon Valley, New York and Washington.
Queen's 'Bohemian Rhapsody' hits 1 billion views on YouTubeQueen's 'Bohemian Rhapsody' hits 1 billion views on YouTube
Your safari selfies are cute, but they're a road map for poachersIn South Africa alone, around 1,200 rhinos were killed in 2017 — equivalent to approximately three per day. The poachers shoot the animal in the head, tear the horn from the skull, and leave the rhino to die.
French journalist arrested while reporting on protest in AustraliaFrench television journalist Hugo Clement was arrested alongside his crew while they were reporting on a protest in the Australian state of Queensland.
Australia detains French television crew filming anti-coal protest
Protesters attacked, tear-gassed as Hong Kong protest march violentProtesters threw eggs at the central government's Liaison Office and spray-painted its surveillance cameras. China's national emblem was splattered with black ink.
Meet the Swiss league that's the antidote to football's super richMeet the Swiss league that's the antidote to football's super rich
Feline baffled: 'Cats' cinematic adaptation provokes strong views
House Dems demand answers from Hope Hicks over 'apparent inconsistencies' in her testimony"Anything other than complete candor can have very serious consequences," Judiciary Committee Chairman Jerrold Nadler wrote to the ex-Trump aide.
FBI believed Trump was closely involved in hush-money scheme, unsealed documents show
Watch: Footage from jet-powered flyboard at Bastille Day celebrations
Space leaders recall how the Apollo Moon landing gave them inspirationTo celebrate the anniversary, NASA has restored the old control room from which the Apollo-era flight directors oversaw the mission. It's a place of pilgrimage for their successors.
Where on Earth to mark the 50th anniversary of the Apollo 11 moon landing
David Marcus goes to Washington; Jeffrey Katzenberg lands NBC NewsByers Market is a daily newsletter from NBC News senior media reporter Dylan Byers that takes you behind the scenes in Hollywood, Silicon Valley, New York and Washington.
Large pod of over 100 dolphins surrounds boat in California
Safe, cheap and sustainable: Clean water technology for AfricaIn this episode of Futuris, we meet the African and European scientists working together to find ways to disinfect water for domestic use in remote, isolated places in Africa, using sustainable and affordable technology.
Mark Zuckerberg beats the FTC; Susan Zirinsky bets on NorahByers Market is a daily newsletter from NBC News senior media reporter Dylan Byers that takes you behind the scenes in Hollywood, Silicon Valley, New York and Washington.
'Yellow Vests' clash with police in Paris after Bastille Day parade
Dreams of movie stardom? Nah. More teens today long to be influencers"A lot of my friends say, 'I don't want to go off and work in a cubicle. I want to be a YouTuber,'" Madison Brass, 16, of Ohio, said.
Concern or circus? Should we speculate on Merkel's health?Three shaking bouts in under a month have sparked concerns for the health and well-being of German Chancellor Angela Merkel. But has the subsequent media coverage really been necessary?
An ancient family estate is putting the English into English teaHow is the changing climate affecting the home of the first English Tea Grown in England?
Watch: Music fills the air at the Dubrovnik Summer Festival
Morocco criticised over press freedom after journalist's fine
We stayed at the first 5-star hotel in Saint-TropezWe checked in at Byblos Palace hotel on the Cote d'Azur to indulge in slow living, French style.
UK far-right activist Tommy Robinson sentenced to nine months in jail
Blindly fighting the symptoms of radicalisation in Europe won’t address the causes ǀ View
Attorney who oversaw porn film fraud scheme sentenced to five yearsJohn Steele, 48, who had pled guilty to a litany of charges more two years ago, was also ordered to pay restitution of more than $1.5 million.
Soviet nuclear sub that sank off Norway in 1989 still emitting radiation
The BBC is closing the gender pay gap. Now it must deal with the ethnic pay chasm ǀ View
Saudi princess tried over alleged abuse of Paris workmanSaudi princess tried in absentia over alleged abuse of workman in Paris
Italian police release video of deadly mid-air crashItalian authorities have released video footage captured inside an aircraft involved in a deadly mid-air crash in the Alps earlier this year.
'Men in Black' and 'Larry Sanders' actor Rip Torn dies at 88Rip Torn, his real name, had scrapes with fellow artists and the law in a career during which he was nominated for nine Emmys, an Oscar and a Tony.
Essentials: 10 Items for an easy packaging free shopWe recommend a few essentials to make your packaging free weekly shop a breeze
Qingdao hosts the China Wealth ForumAlready the second-largest economy in the world, China is at a crossroads, poised to leverage the opportunities provided by years of careful development, comprehensive reform and innovative growth schemes.
Rustic sculpture of Melania Trump unveiled in her native Slovenia
US police find girl from viral video who licked supermarket ice creamIt was the "cold case" that gripped the US but police in Texas said on Friday they had found the girl who was filmed licking a tub of ice cream and returning it to a supermarket fridge in a viral video last week.
Are we living in a simulated universe? Here's what scientists say."If we are living in a simulation, then the cosmos that we are observing is just a tiny piece of the totality of physical existence."
Powerful quake hits Southern California, causing damage and injuries"Homes shifted, foundation cracks, retaining walls down," the San Bernadino County Fire Department said on Twitter.
Whats on in July? Environmental arts and culture across Europe
We tried a new train journey that can take you into the past
International cooperation the key to prosperity and to building a Creative QingdaoThe brightest minds from home and abroad gathered in Qingdao for the Conference on Building a Creative Qingdao.
'Spider-Man' spins web of delight at children's hospital in LAA few of Earth’s mightiest heroes paid a visit to the Children’s Hospital in Los Angeles
New James Bond movie will see 007 start his latest adventure in Jamaica
'Natural disasters have no borders': Aid Zone meets Europe's first respondersHow do rescue teams from different countries work efficiently together at the height of a disaster? Aid Zone takes a look.
Notre Dame: Probe examines power fault or cigarette as possible causesFrench authorities have no grounds to believe that the fire that wrecked Paris' Notre-Dame Cathedral in April was the result of criminal activity, although they are looking into the possibility of negligence, said the Paris prosecutor's office.
From dancing tomatoes to cyberpunks, E3 show reveals wilder side of gaming
Prada unveils revolutionary bag collection made from ocean plastic
From Matera to the moon: The Apollo Soundtrack brings a unique moment to life 50 years later
Deep sea explorer Jean-Michel Cousteau teaches UAE children about ocean conservation
How to make the most of music festivals without harming the planet
Previously lost Freddie Mercury performance released
Cows with 'portholes' into stomach filmed by animal rights group
These 'cyborg' plants can sense motion and move on commandResearchers foresee a world in which plants collect and transmit information without computers' glaring screens or intrusive sounds.
Maxime Caron's post-apocalyptic images from Chernobyl ghost cityYoung French photographer Maxime Caron visited the post-Apocalyptic town of Pripyat, where the infamous Chernobyl nuclear power plant is located. Report from Chernobyl in the new issue of the European lens.
Hungry polar bear seen hunting for food in city far south of habitatClimate change has been damaging polar bears' sea-ice habitats and forced them to scavenge more for food on land, bringing them into contact with people and inhabited areas.
Ocasio-Cortez defends comparing migrant detention centers to 'concentration camps'"This is not hyperbole. It is the conclusion of expert analysis," the New York lawmaker said in the tweet Tuesday.
Portrait of an environmental artist: Svabhu KohliSvabhu Kohli's illustrations of flora and fauna offer a dreamy glimpse into the artist's love of nature.
Angela Merkel's CDU wins Gorlitz Mayor race, beating far-right AfD
Watch: Hong Kong protesters 'Do you hear the people sing?'
Eighty years since Versailles execution stopped public guillotinings
'Gorliwood' rejects far-right candidate in favour of Romanian migrantAfD candidate Sebastian Wippel would have been the country's first mayor from the far-right Alternative for Germany (AfD) party but did not manage to defeat the CDU candidate in the second round.
Zuzana Caputova sworn in as Slovakia's first female president
Italian film and opera director Franco Zeffirelli dies at 96Franco Zeffirelli, the Italian director acclaimed for his work in film, theatre and opera, has died at the age of 96.
How is Disney’s remake of Aladdin good news for the Middle East?Disney’s live-action remake of Aladdin is amongst the latest additions in Jordan’s contribution to the international film industry.
Film mogul Tarak Ben Ammar urges expansion of Arab cinema industry
Escaping Libya: a special report as warlords lay siege to the countryAs part of a Euronews special, Anelise Borges travels to Libya to meet with those who are desperate to escape the war-torn country,
Bryan Singer to pay $150,000 to resolve rape claim
Giant crystal cave to accept first ever visitorsCrystal shards inside the geode can measure up to a metre long.
China’s Qingdao strengthens its blooming cultural and economic friendship with Germany
Penélope Cruz launches sustainable jewellery collection with Swarovski
'Doomsday' hail storm smashes windows in BavariaA strong hailstorm with golf ball-sized stones hit parts of Bavaria on Monday evening.
German actors lead campaign against AfD government in 'Görliwood'
Chris Pratt and Katherine Schwarzenegger are married! Get all the detailsThe romantic ceremony took place at San Ysidro Ranch in Montecito, California.
Covert videos of women walking at college campus found on porn siteThe women's faces were not visible and those featured in them were not identified by name, officials said.
An all-female road trip around Europe to raise awarenessWe spoke to Julie Brangstrup about her inspiring initiative to help girls across the world.
Eight human stories from D-Day, 75 years on
'Sea creature' washes up outside ParliamentCharity Surfers Against Sewage is demanding the government protect 30% of the world's oceans by 2030.
Holy water and Kinder eggs — the world's weirdest import restrictionsRussia wants to ban imports of meat and dairy products for personal use but other countries around the world have some stranger import restrictions.
Croatia: new experiences to try this Spring
'Happy hunting': Border Patrol searches on buses increase
As the world commemorates Tiananmen Square, China is silentAs the rest of the world marks the 30th anniversary of the Tiananmen Square protests and massacre, China finds ways to make its citizens avoid it.
Apple is getting rid of iTunes — what does it mean for your downloads?Technology giant Apple on Monday confirmed recent speculation from key players in the industry that it was going to scrap its historic iTunes service.
Elton John condemns censoring of Rocketman gay scenes in Russia
Trump's tea with Prince Charles could get awkward over the environmentPrince Charles, 70, has championed sustainability for decades through his speeches, articles, books and films.
Cruise ship collides with Venice tourist boat, injuring four peopleA towering, out-of-control cruise ship rammed into a dock and a tourist riverboat on a busy Venice canal on Sunday morning
At least 5 injured after cruise ship hits tour boat and dock in Venice
Which beauty brands are challenging plastic pollution?This June: Beauty giants take on plastic.
Will Leonardo DiCaprio open his new eco-resort in Belize in 2020?
Serb ultranationalists protest over Kosovo Albanian culture festivalIt comes just a day after Serbia put its troops on high alert following the arrest of 19 people in an anti-crime operation in restive northern Kosovo, in an area primarily populated by ethnic Serbs.
How Justin Bieber shut down an Icelandic beauty spotThe Fjaðrárgljúfur canyon in Iceland has been closed to the public after hordes of visitors flocked to the site.
AI just finished Franz Schubert's 'Unfinished Symphony'
Light pollution from SpaceX satellites may block view of stars
Forming an orderly queue...on Mount Everest
Can green products be made without a single drop of fossil fuels?
How starches and vegetable oils are made into bioplastic bags
Cannes Film Festival 2019 winnersThis year's winner of the Palme d'Or prize at the Cannes Film festival has been awarded to South Korean director Bong Joon-ho for his film 'Parasite'.
'Parasite' directed by Bong Joon-ho wins the Palme d'or in Cannes
Ten ways to make lunching al-desko more eco-friendlyGrab your glass jars, slice your sandwiches and follow these simple tips for keeping your al-desko lunch green.
Record-breaking number of flights in UK airpsace in one dayAbout 9,000 planes were scheduled to travel in the UK airspace on Friday, a record.
US and Cuba clash, big data gets ever bigger - and the flavour of Game of Thrones lingersThe US revives sanctions against Cuba, big data becomes ever more valuable and Game Of Thrones fans get a tasty souvenir.
Leonardo DiCaprio and Orlando Bloom on Cannes red carpetHollywood heartthrob Leonardo DiCaprio made his third appearance in as many days on the Cannes Film Festival red carpet on Thursday (May 23), this time accompanied by actor Orlando Bloom.
Theresa May: How Brexit defined then destroyed her premiership
Top 6 spectacular mountain hutsFrom full-service refuges to minimalist structures.
Cast and director of "Oh Mercy!" on red carpet at Cannes Film Festival
Michael Avenatti charged with stealing money from Stormy DanielsThe money was from a publisher working with Daniels on a book deal.
Tarantino,  DiCaprio, Pitt greeted by screaming fans in Cannes
How Jennifer Lopez is out to save our world's oceansThe american singer-actress is venturing into the world of sustainability with a new collection that will keep our oceans clean.
Fake content floods Facebook ahead of EU elections
Sex abuse scandal exposed in new film rocks Catholic Church in Poland
In the wake of its own child abuse scandal, Poland must break the Church’s grip ǀ View
When art is a force for goodThe exhibitions and documentaries on climate change to have on your radar this month.
Austria: What to know about the video which took the government down
Euronews' favourite 10 European movies at Cannes Festival
EU MEDIA unit backs European films and equality at Cannes Film Festival
Corruption probe a blow for far-right parties ahead of EU elections
Cannes Film Festival under fire for honorary Palme d'Or to Alain Delon
Meet the Press Film Festival with AFI returnsSubmissions for the festival are now open.
Another horse dies after injury at Santa Anita Park, 24th since December
Cannes Film Festival: A look at the next generation of film directors
How 'Big Bang Theory' outlived the critics and haters — and got the last laugh ǀ View
Nearly 500,000 fans demand final Game of Thrones season be remade
Puccini's gripping thriller 'Tosca' returns to ParisIt is one of the most dramatic thrillers in the history of opera, and now Giacomo Puccini's Tosca has returned to Paris.
Prince Harry wins damages over aerial pictures of his private homeHarry's lawyer said a news agency chartered a helicopter in January to take photos and film the private home of Harry and his wife, Meghan.
Priest sex abuse film goes viral in Poland
Shock, intrigue and controversy at Venice Biennale, as theme asks artists to reflect on politicsThere is plenty to see at the 58th Venice Biennale. From dismembered objects, a film from Chernobyl's "twin sister", and the wreck of a boat on which more than 600 migrants were killed.
UK talk show cancelled after man outed as cheating on girlfriend diesThe death of Steven Dymond, who had taken part in a lie detector test in an episode, has raised questions about broadcasters' responsibility.
European Sleepovers: Lithuania - emigration in Europe's hidden gem
Red carpet out for opening ceremony of the 72nd Cannes Film Festival
Watch: Curtain goes up on 72nd Cannes Film Festival
Explorer reaches bottom of Mariana Trench, sets new record for deepest dive everVictor Vescovo dove to a depth of 35,853 feet in the deepest part of the Pacific Ocean — and saw new animals as well as plastic litter.
The center of the Democratic 2020 field is wider than expectedFirst Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
Deepest ever dive made by man into the Mariana trench unearths plasticOne man reached the deepest point in the ocean, only to find litter and sweet wrappers.
The ghosts of Russia's dying villages are brought to life
Meet the disabled man behind Russia's most-read political blog
72nd Cannes Film Festival poster honours late Agnes Varda
Cannes Film Festival poster unfurled
Wrestling Silver King dies during packed show in London
The beach from 'The Beach' will stay shut for 2 more yearsMaya Bay on  Phi Phi Leh Island became world famous after a Hollywood crew set foot on its sands in 1999.
This film festival will inspire you to push boundariesWe tour Banff, the festival showcasing some of the best adventure films in the world.
Former Air Force intelligence analyst charged with leaking Obama-era drone secretsCourt documents said the analyst gave classified documents to a reporter which were published on a news site federal officials confirmed was The Intercept.
European Sleepovers: Unity in Cyprus, Europe's divided city
Lord of the Rings star slams far-right party Vox over Aragorn tweetLord of the Rings actor Viggo Mortensen took up arms after Spanish far-right party Vox used the character of Aragorn in a promotional electoral campaign tweet.
Will Prince Harry and Meghan Markle be raising a vegan royal baby?The royal couple are supposedly breaking with tradition with this modern decision
Aeroflot SU1492 inferno: what do we know?What do we know about Aeroflot flight SU1492 that was engulfed in flames in Moscow?
Chewbacca tribute: Euronews pays respects to Star Wars' Peter MayhewChewbacca's unique cry transcends language, but we here at Euronews HQ wanted to try and emulate the sound with our multiple language teams to pay tribute Peter Mayhew, who died this week.
Dubai’s best theme parksFrom roller coasters to waterslides, here’s how to keep the whole family entertained at the theme parks while on a trip to the UAE
Peter Mayhew, Chewbacca in 'Star Wars,' dies at 74Mayhew towered — literally — as the 200-year-old Wookiee from the planet Kashyyyk who co-piloted Han Solo's Millennium Falcon.
What’s on in May? A curated agenda of exhibitions and experiencesA curated agenda of all the best the Arts have to offer this month.
European sleepovers: We feel Europe’s pulse ahead of May’s elections
Comic book fans marvel at Middle East Film and Comic ConIt is proving to be a big year for film and television fans, so thousands of them celebrated by gathering at the Middle East Film and Comic Con in Dubai.
What clues are in purported Al-Baghdadi video?
John Singleton dies at 51 after suffering strokeAt 24, Singleton became the youngest and the first black filmmaker to receive an Oscar nomination for best director and best original screenplay for "Boyz n the Hood."
So-called IS leader appears in alleged new videoSo-called Islamic State media network published on Monday what it said was a video message from its leader Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi for the first time in five years.
London Marathon champions use of seaweed water pouches
New Netflix documentary goes behind the scenes with Ocasio-CortezFrom bartender to congresswoman: "Knock Down the House" tells the story of the New Yorker's stunning upset — with rare glimpses of her moments self-doubt.
Sustainable dairy products made in MaliInspire Africa is in Mali to find out more about the young entrepreneur creating a sustainable ecosystem for herders and farmers in his country.
'Ghost Army' veterans recall secret World War Two mission
Partnerships boost UAE's space ambitionsThe UAE space programme is striking partnerships with established space players as it seeks to turn its space dreams of Mars exploration and human spaceflight into reality.
How Chopard became the first ethical luxury jewellery brand
Danish Quran-burning politician gaining support for election candidacy
Rather than hiding its racist cartoons, Disney needs to teach people about them ǀ View
Former Nissan boss Carlos Ghosn posts $4.5m bail
Briton Peter Brook wins prestigious Princess of Asturias arts prize
Five ways to get involved with fashion revolution weekWhether you’re already a conscious shopper, work in the fashion industry, or simply want to glean more perspective on the choices you make as a consumer.
'Boyz n the Hood' director John Singleton suffers stroke"John is currently in the ICU and under great medical care," a statement from Singleton's family read.
Roman Polanski sues Oscars to get academy membership reinstatedThe Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences ejected Polanski and Bill Cosby nearly a year ago, saying they violated its code of conduct.
'Her life was a shining light': Tributes paid to journalist Lyra McKee
Artists tackle social issues at Sharjah BiennialThe 14th edition of the Sharjah Biennial, which runs until June 10, is made up of paintings and sculptures dotted across customised sites throughout the emirate.
The Mueller report is out. What do Democrats do next?First Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
Two men arrested over Lyra McKee's murder, Northern Irish police say
Earthquake with 6.1 magnitude hits Taiwan's east coastA 6.1 magnitude earthquake struck Taiwan's east coast on Thursday (April 18), shaking buildings and temporarily halting subway services in the capital, Taipei.
Declassified U-2 spy plane photos are helping archaeologists uncover ancient sitesThe images offer a vast trove of information about ancient villages and agricultural sites.
Terrorist content removal: “United in Action” rather than “United in Grief” ǀ View
Italian man claims €137,000 by faking disability for over 10 yearsAn Italian man has been arrested by police for fraud after falsely claiming €137,000 in benefits by pretending to be disabled.
Veterans could be first to pay as DeVos rolls back for-profit college oversightVeterans are often sought out by schools with low graduation and job-placement rates because of their access to federal aid.
Unexploded WWII bomb found in FrankfurtIt created a massive underwater blast when the police defused it.
For Northern Ireland, 'Game of Thrones' is much more than a popular TV showTourism has become big business for Northern Ireland, with the show helping to attract 120,000 visitors a year and bringing in $40 million a year.
Death of terminally-ill woman reignites euthanasia debate in Spain
Celebrity chef Gordon Ramsay: "It's passion I think."Euronews' caught up with British celebrity chef Gordon Ramsay about life, work and politics.
Netflix pulls Felicity Huffman movie from April schedule after guilty plea
Warner Brothers: Trump can't use 'Dark Knight Rises' in campaign videoThe film company confirmed on Tuesday that it will file a copyright infringement suit against the White House.
Netanyahu's party admits it hired 1,200 people to secretly film Arab community polling stationsIsraeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu, facing a tight re-election battle, seeks to become Israel's longest-serving prime minister.
Animal rights activists arrested in Australia after traffic protest
Where will it stop? The overwhelming, ever-expanding Democratic fieldThe number of candidates running for president could shatter all records. Some worry that's too many choices.
Battle for power in Libya reaches the capital Tripoli
Unbowed by tough week, Biden forges forward on potential White House bidA week that started with the former vice president dealing with a mini-crisis ended with him even closer to declaring his candidacy.
Add social media to the list of things souring Americans on politicsFirst Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
Tensions flare in Libya as commander orders forces to move on TripoliEastern Libyan commander Khalifa Haftar ordered his troops to march on the capital Tripoli as the UN tries to push for a peace deal.
British soldiers use picture of Jeremy Corbyn as a shooting targetThe British Army has launched an investigation into a video circulating of British soldiers using a picture of the Labour party leader Jeremy Corbyn as a shooting target.
Trump needles Biden over claims: 'Are you having a good time, Joe?'The president, speaking at a GOP fundraising dinner on Tuesday, also suggested that "the socialists" were behind recent allegations against his potential 2020 rival.
DOJ to Oscars: Potential new Netflix rules could be an issueSteven Spielberg reportedly planned to introduce rule changes that could block Netflix from competing for Oscars.
Aretha Franklin documentary has premiere at church where it was filmed"We're at the holiest of holies, right here at the epicenter of where it actually happened," the film's producer said.
Mussolini's granddaughter slams Jim Carrey over cartoon of ex-dictator
Best wildlife experiences of AprilLooking for ways to engage with nature this month? These are the best wildlife events, trips and books to have on your radar in April 2019.
Grande dame of French cinema Agnes Varda dies at 90
Legendary French film director Agnès Varda dies at the age of 90
'I have hope, but the window is closing all the time'We usually talk to political analysts to find answers here in Brussels, but today hear from famous primatologist Jane Goodall on her hopes and fears for the future of planet Earth.
French director Agnès Varda dies at 90
Watch: Cameras roll in Damascus as film industry calls action again
The week that was: is identity a battle between light and darkness?
Adventure photography: witnessing the fate of Icelandic glaciersOur interview with outdoor image makers Ulrika Larsson and Lukasz Warzecha.
Crikey! Golfers left in awe by giant gator in GeorgiaAn enormous alligator was spotted strolling onto a golf course in Georgia, United States on Sunday (March 24).
Male migrants routinely raped too, study finds
More video emerges of chaos on board Norway shipPassengers filmed their scary experience on the Viking Sky cruise ship off the coast of Norway on Saturday (March 23) and Sunday (March 24).
Why Cannes is a magnet for the world’s real estate industryCannes, the playground of the rich and famous on the French Riviera, is not just known for its annual film festival. It’s also a magnet for the world’s real estate industry.
Artist creates lifelike sculptures from plastic bottles
Watch: French Spiderman climbs skyscraper to save crumbling Notre-Dame
Controversial European copyright reforms to get final vote todayIt has been lauded by Paul McCartney and criticised by Wyclef Jean - But after two years of wrangling, the European Parliament will vote today on controversial copyright reforms.
Apple event: Company announces credit card, news subscription serviceThe services signal a new era for a company that has long focused on hardware.
Macron says he hopes severely injured protester gains 'more wisdom'"I'm 73, what could happen to me?" activist Genevière Legay said at a peaceful gilets jaunes march, before she was severely injured when police closed in on protesters.
Wild elephant makes trouble on downtown street in southwest ChinaA wild elephant, rejected by his herd by another male, was forced to wander the streets of Meng'a Town in southwest China's Yunnan Province and destroyed almost 10 vehicles.
Watch again: MEPs back controversial copyright reform
'Game of Thrones' star Emilia Clarke reveals she survived 2 brain aneurysms"Game of Thrones" star Emilia Clarke wrote an essay for The New Yorker detailing two brain aneurysms she had.
'Game of Thrones' actress says she almost died from brain aneurysms"I'd never experienced fear like that — a sense of doom closing in," Clarke wrote in an essay. "I could see my life ahead, and it wasn't worth living."
Four-year-old who survived New Zealand mosque attack fights for her life"I coped, I was able to perform my job and I left my emotions until after I had repaired her," said Dr Adib Khanafer, his voice breaking mid-sentence.
Dem candidate Hickenlooper explains why he watched an X-rated movie with his momThe former Colorado governor also drew attention for comments he made about women 2020 presidential candidates.
51 school kids rescued after bus driver sets fire to vehicle in ItalyCarabinieri officers freed the hostages and captured their kidnapper after "an operation that we see in films with special agents," a prosecutor said.
Democratic super PAC launches $50 million effort to weaken Trump with core supportersThe American Bridge group is expanding its budget nearly three-fold to target Midwest white working-class voters.
Jordan Peele's 'Us' is what horror fans want: scary, beautiful and unforgettable ǀ View
Brigitte Bardot faces lawsuit over 'racist' comments about French islandIn a letter, Bardot described inhabitants of the French island, Reunion, as "aboriginals who have kept the genes of savages."
Billionaire arrested in London over India’s biggest banking fraud
Bullying McCain, Trump shows his fights don't stop at the graveyard's edgeAnalysis: There's no upside to attacking a dead man, but Trump can't help himself.
Geneva's International Film Festival and Forum On Human Rights Wrap upGeneva's 2019 International Film Festival and Forum On Human Rights wraps up with awards going to the acclaimed feminist documentary 'Delphine et Carole : Insoumuses' and 'Lucha Congo'.
Ximei documentary premieres at Geneva Human Rights Film FestivalXimei documentary produced by Chinese contemporary artist Ai Weiwei premieres at the International Film Festival and Forum on Human Rights in Geneva
Jack the Ripper's identity may finally be known, thanks to DNAResearchers tested blood and semen found on a shawl near the body of the killer's fourth victim, a woman whose mutilated body was found in September 1888.
Philadelphia, Pennsylvania: the birthplace of US democracy
Mourners pay tribute to New Zealand victims, await burialsAs a light rain fell, people clutched each other and wept quietly at makeshift memorials outside the Al Noor mosque in Christchurch.
Police body investigate images of police stashing alleged PSG jerseysThe French police investigation body has opened an enquiry into whether officers were stealing PSG jerseys after a viral video shows them stashing red and white t-shirts into a bag next to the club's store in the Champs Elysees.
Ardern's office received suspect's 'manifesto' minutes before attackNew Zealand's Prime Minister Jacinda Ardern said her office received the shooter's "manifesto" minutes before the attack.
New Zealand shooting suspect's travels highlight interest in white Christian history
Watch: Police detain suspect in New Zealand shooting
New Zealand mosque shootings: How did social media platforms react?Social media giants have come under fire for allowing footage of the shooting, allegedly filmed live by the gunman as the attack unfolded, to be widely circulated.
‘Crude’ art exhibition explores social impact of oil industry in the Middle East
Mosque terrorist may have targeted New Zealand because it's so safeAlthough not confirmed by authorities, a 74-page manifesto titled "The Great Replacement" was posted online that matched several details about the attack.
Climate strikes: Students in 123 countries take part in marches
New Zealand: death toll climbs to 50 after body found at mosque
New Zealand: 49 dead in mass shootings at Christchurch mosques
2 K-pop stars in sex scandals being questioned by South Korean policeSeungri, a member of Big Bang, and Jung Joon-young have both announced their retirement amid investigations into the interlocking sex scandals.
What is the Ukrainian government's 'blacklist'? | Euronews answersRussians dominate the list as tensions between Moscow and Kiev have reached a post-Soviet era high. What is the list about and who is on it?
Made in Qingdao: China’s City of Film gets serious about attracting filmmakers with subsidiesQingdao has already come a long way towards earning its moniker City of Film: Spring Festival blockbusters ‘The Wandering Earth’ and ‘Crazy Alien’ were filmed and produced in the East China city.
Lori Loughlin's daughter under fire online over college cheating scandal
Black actors call on Hollywood to hire stylists who understand natural hair
Macron: The face of a French renaissance or European nightmare? ǀ View
Watch: White man on tube directs monkey noises at a black passenger
How will new law alter Brits' access to porn sites? | Euronews answers
The Italian firm recycling glassfiber
Cummings seeks testimony from two more Trump attorneys about Cohen paymentsHouse Oversight Committee chairman wants to interview the lawyers about shifting answers regarding Trump's payments.
Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez takes aim at the 'worship' of 'meh'At South by Southwest, the 29-year-old freshman congresswoman drew bigger crowds than any of the half-dozen presidential candidates who came to Austin, too.
Beto O'Rourke drops f-bombs, snaps at staff, stresses out in revealing new documentaryThe Texas Democrat attended the premiere of an inside look at his campaign against Sen. Ted Cruz as he ponders a possible presidential run.
'Captain Marvel' is unapologetically cheesy and unsurprisingly badass
German archeologists unearth 400 artefacts from Nazi mass murder site
SpaceX's Crew Dragon capsule returns to Earth after historic test flightThe company is one step closer to carrying human passengers aboard its spacecraft.
'Captain Marvel' faces off against online trolls in lead-up to debut
International Women’s Day: Common female-related questions answered
'Leaving Neverland' is a long overdue reckoning for Michael Jackson fans ǀ View
Barbarin resigns after receiving suspended prison sentence
North Korea glorifies Kim's summit with Trump in new documentary
This lighting designer label is the coolest thing right nowHer French vintage glass shades gets instantly sold-out.
Last Sunrise shines as it wins first prize at Fantasporto film festival“Last Sunrise” by Chinese-American director Wen Ren wins first prize at the Fantasporto international film festival in Portugal
Best wildlife experiences of the monthLooking for ways to engage with nature this month? These are the best wildlife events, trips and books to have on your radar in March 2019.
Spielberg's spat with Netflix taps into fight over the future of movies
WarnerMedia announces massive restructuring to compete with streaming servicesThe announcement comes just days after two top executives announced their departures from the new, AT&T-owned company.
SpaceX launches Crew Dragon capsule on crucial test flight to the space stationThe critical debut flight will go through every step of a real mission — just without any human passengers onboard.
Amazon whale carcass and Trump-Kim summit 2.0: No Comment of the weekFrom a whale carcass in the Amazon to the second summit of US President Donald Trump and North Korean leader Kim Jong Un, take a look at our selection of the best videos from this week's No Comment section.
Hockney — Van Gogh: The Joy of NatureA new exhibition in Amsterdam shows the deep connection the two renowned painters have to nature.
Would you pay €200,000 to burn a statue of the king of Spain?
Russia set to free 100 captive whales from 'prison'
Harlem Globetrotters team up with Philly Pops orchestraThe Harlem Globetrotters have teamed up with the Philly Pops orchestra for a unique performance captured on video.
I knew Orbán when he started his political journey; where it’s taken him terrifies me ǀ View
Five tips to shoot better video with your mobile phone from an expertSmartphone video specialist Mark Egan gives you some quick tips on how to instantly improve videos filmed with your phone.
Three key claims Michael Cohen made about Donald Trump
From 'fire and fury' to 'great success,' North Korea is the exception, not the ruleFirst Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
Rotten Tomatoes can make or break a movie. That's why it's cracking down on trolls.The popular service is disabling user comments before a movie drops in theaters.
Angelina Jolie makes rare appearance in NYC with all 6 of her childrenThey're all growing up so fast!
Cohen said to be ready to reveal Trump Org. check tied to porn star paymentProsecutors say the payment was designed to buy Stormy Daniels' silence about an alleged affair with Donald Trump.
Cohen plans to reveal Trump's "lies, racism and cheating"Former fixer to the US president is expected to reveal details of his bosses' business affairs in Russia and payoffs to women.
Watch: Kim Jong-un pauses for cigarette break on marathon train tripA cigarette break in style means having a crystal ashtray on hand at all times.
Brazil's right-wing government asks schools to read president's sloganPresident Jair Bolsonaro has openly praised the 1964-85 dictatorship.
Netflix lost the best picture battle, but its war with Hollywood is just getting started"It doesn't really matter that 'Roma' didn't win best picture. Netflix has unleashed the power of a new business model that will be with us for a long time."
The Oscars finally felt fun again and not even 'Green Book' could ruin it ǀ View
Sightings of green snow concerns residents of Russian cityRepeated sightings of green-coloured snow in the Russian city of Pervouralsk is concerning residents.
Watch again: everything you need to know about 5G from the MWC5G internet is being called the next wireless revolution and is one of the main themes at this year's World Mobile Conference in Barcelona. 

But what exactly will it change in our day-to-day lives? And does 5G pose any risks to our health and security?
90 years of best actress Oscar winners and their gorgeous gownsHere's a look back at the gowns worn by Oscar-winning best actresses.
Glenn Close's golden Oscars gown had 4 million beads — and weighed 42 poundsWho needs a shiny trophy when you can bring your own gold to the Academy Awards?
Here is the full list of Oscar winners from the 91st Academy Awards
Lady Gaga's €26 million necklace and other style details you missed from the OscarsLady Gaga's €26-million necklace was just one eye-catching piece at this year's Academy Award.
Rami Malek wins the Oscar for Best Actor
Oscars 2019: what you need to know
"Gilets jaunes" take over Starbucks Coffee on Paris' Champs-Elysees
At Vatican abuse summit, African nun scolds bishops on their errorsAt Vatican abuse summit, African nun scolds bishops on their errors
The week that was: ‘the measure of a man is what he does with power'
Here's who won at France's César movie awards
Vote: Who do you think deserves to walk away with an Oscar in 2019?Tell us who you think deserves to walk away with a golden statue by voting in the Euronews Oscars 2019 poll
Bear Grylls faces possible fine over filming 'violations' in BulgariaThe Bulgarian Environment Ministry said in a statement Thursday that Bear Grylls could face a fine for "violations" during filming of his show in a national park.
How does the Academy Award ceremony works?
Michael Jackson's estate sues HBO for $100M over documentary about alleged sexual abuse
Pope at abuse summit: 'Listen to the cry of the young who want justice'Catholic officials in many parts of Europe, Latin America, Africa and Asia still deny that clergy sex abuse exists or downplay the problem.
Pope leads four-day summit into sexual abuse in Catholic Church
Why scientists say experiencing awe can help you live your best lifePsychologists say the emotion of awe plays a big role in our health, happiness and wellbeing. And you don't need to witness a supermoon to experience it.
The future is here! Nike just released their latest version of self-lacing sneakersWe think Marty McFly would approve.
Thousands rally against anti-Semitism in France after spike in attacks"Whoever did this is not worthy of the French republic and will be punished," President Macron said after swastikas were found at a Jewish cemetery.
Thousands rally against anti-Semitism in FranceThousands of people rallied across France after a surge of anti-Semitic attacks in recent weeks that culminated on Tuesday with vandals daubing swastikas and anti-Jewish slogans on dozens of graves in a Jewish cemetery.
Women take centre stage at 69th Berlin Film FestivalFemale filmmakers feature prominently at 2019 Berlin Film Festival.
Qingdao: the city at the forefront of China's booming film industryIs this year the turning point for China’s film industry? Based on how Chinese film has made international headlines this lunar new year holiday, this may well be the case, and for one city in particular: Qingdao.
State Department video uses former embassy to send a message to IraniansVideo seeks to draw a contrast between how the U.S. and Iran have behaved in the decades since the Iranian Revolution.
Boris Johnson gets up close and personal with a cheetahThe former UK foreign minister cuddled up with a cheetah at Howletts Animal Park in Kent.
Minnesota nice: visiting Minneapolis, the welcoming city of lakes
The Oscars can't seem to make up its mind about anything. Here's a timeline.
Political and social films triumph at Berlin FestivalThe awards ceremony marked the end of Dieter Kosslick’s career as Berlinale director after 18 years.
'Synonymes' wins Golden Bear for Best Film at Berlinale AwardsThe Franco-German-Israeli co-production, "Synonymes" (Synonyms) has won the Golden Bear for Best Film at the Berlinale Awards. The film was made by Nadav Lapid.
After Ryan Adams allegations, will #MeToo finally roil music industry?"I don't know why it took so long to get here, but I think more is very likely to come out," said a music journalist.
Swiss actor Bruno Ganz dies aged 77Ganz, 77, is best-known for portraying Adolf Hitler in the Oscar-nominated Downfall; the kindly grandfather in Swiss family movie Heidi; and the angel Damiel in Wim Wenders’ 1987 film Wings of Desire.
'Die Toten Hosen' music documentary premieres at Berlinale festival
Switzerland's best known actor, Bruno Ganz, dies at the age of 77Switzerland's best known actor, Bruno Ganz, dies at the age of 77
Gilets jaunes: Paramilitaries 'ready to intervene' in France protests
James Cameron's latest epic is ambitious and beautiful — but ultimately hollow ǀ View
Playing nice: Senators running for president are friends first. Can it last?Democratic hopefuls have heaped praise on rivals entering the increasingly crowded field. Strategists say that's bound to change soon.
Chefs recreate Hollywood monster King Kong with 1.8m chocolate statue
Former boxer in 'Yellow Vest' protest gets one year jail sentence
Filmmakers hand back award given by ex-Catalan chief Puigdemont
Movie stars and British royalty mix at BAFTAsReal royalty met acting royalty at the BAFTAs on Sunday night, as the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge congratulated the winners after the ceremony.
Here are the Oscar winners you won't see on the Academy AwardsFour Oscars will be presented during commercial breaks for the 91st Academy Awards.
Brexit road trip day 2: Blaenau Gwent and Boston
Netflix film Roma scoops top prize at BAFTA awardsThe black-and-white movie about a domestic worker in 1970s Mexico won Best Film as well as Best Director for Alfonso Cuaron.
Europe briefing: Five stories to know about todayHere is our round-up of key stories across Europe so far today.
Star of German cinema presents latest work at Berlin Festival
Why Israel is terrified of global boycott movementThe campaign is also reverberating in the U.S., where the Senate passed a bill Tuesday that would allow states to punish businesses that take part in Israel boycotts.
Feds weighing if National Enquirer publisher violated non-prosecution agreementAmazon CEO says AMI threatened to publish intimate photos of Bezos and his girlfriend if he did not stop investigating how AMI had obtained them.
Lorena Bobbitt's violent act became a joke without focusing on cause, she saysBobbitt, who cut off her husband's penis in 1993, said she had suffered domestic abuse and then was "victimized again by the media" and society.
Wagner’s The Valkyrie debuts in Abu DhabiRichard Wagner’s The Valkyrie was staged in the United Arab Emirates for the very first time. The performance was part of the Abu Dhabi Classics season, an initiative that brings international musical talent to the emirates.
Brexit happens in 7 weeks. We went on a 1,200-mile road trip to survey the chaos.
Rolando Villazón and La Fura dels Baus mix Mozart and science fictionMusica heads to Salzburg for Mozart Week (Mozartwoche), this year under the direction of tenor Rolando Villazón. The festival opened with the spectecular staging of Thamos, staged by the theatre company La Fura dels Baus.
Giant effigies of Trump, Putin and Macron to feature in France paradeThe annual event will be run from February 16 to March 2.
Video of shark used as bong lands Australian fisherman in hot waterPolice in Australia have not confirmed that the shark used for the bong was real.
Bosnia declares state of emergency amid severe floods
Countries cut Polish beef imports, as EU starts 'sick cow' inspectionCountries cut Polish beef imports after 'sick cow' scandal as EU begins inspection
What really happened in Burger King's Super Bowl commercial with Andy Warhol?Did the iconic artist, who died in over 30 years ago, just show up in a new Super Bowl commercial? Yes, yes he did.
Ava DuVernay among celebrities boycotting Super Bowl in support of Colin Kaepernick"To watch the game is to compromise my beliefs," the film director tweeted. "It's not worth it."
Young snowboarders show off their skills on French streetsTwo young brothers and their friend took advantage of the fresh snow in Briancon, a commune in France's Hautes-Alpes region, on Friday by snowboarding through the streets of its iconic old town.
It's Groundhog Day again in the United StatesGroundhog Phil left his den in Pennsylvania on Saturday and didn't see his shadow, predicting that spring will arrive soon this year..
Pennsylvania’s famous groundhog predicts early springPennsylvania’s famed groundhog, 'Punxsutawney Phil', has predicted that spring will come early this year.
State of the Union: Venezuela moves and deciphering the EUIn this edition: which way forward on Venezuela, the EU makes its move and we breakdown the week in letters and numbers.
Polar vortex: Millions hit by freezing temperatures in US
French and Spanish reporters detained in Venezuela have been freed
Meat from sick cow abattoir in Poland 'sold to ten EU countries'
Behind the lens of Roman Königshofer's outdoor photographyRight at the heart of the Austrian Alps, you'll find Roman Königshofer (@rawmeyn), an Austrian explorer-turned-photographer whose photographs suggest that paradise can be found here, on our back doorstep — or at least, on his.
Grammy-winning R&B singer James Ingram dead at 66He was well-known for his soundtrack work, most notably a duet with Linda Ronstadt on "Somewhere Out There," for the 1986 animated film "An American Tail".
Sand animations tell stories at this festival in RussiaDrawing a line in the sand... then another, and another until an image appears.
Matera: Discovering the lessons of history in Europe’s Capital of CultureMatera is a rising star - it’s the 2019 European Capital of Culture. Visiting the southern Italian town still feels very much like discovering something wonderful that few people know about.
Yellow vest protester blames police after suffering serious eye injury
Landmines: Ukraine's east still battling invisible killer
Do remarks by Giuliani, Trump count as witness tampering or obstruction?Analysis: The most problematic part of a recent Trump tweet about Michael Cohen is the cryptic recommendation to watch his father-in-law.
Divisions emerge in the French yellow vest movement
Oscar-winning French composer Michel Legrand dies, age 86Oscar-winning French composer Michel Legrand has died at age 86.
Quirky, antiquated, or just plain silly. How UK Parliament passes lawsYou don't get much more old school than the British Parliament. Shouting in the chamber, single file counting, Ayes and Noes - Euronews explains the creaking process.
State of the Union: 2 minutes to midnightThe doomsday clock is stuck at two minutes to midnight - while in Europe people take to the streets to call against global warming, a name dispute, Brexit. We speak to the Hungarian foreign minister on the dispute with Brussels and Serbian film director Emir Kusturica on his views about the EU.
Michael Jackson documentary stirs controversy ahead of premiere
Here's how smart toilets of the future could protect your health"Everything these days is connected and smart, but I feel like the bathroom is a very untapped area."
Oscars 2019: Netflix makes its mark and Lady Gaga gets a nod
2019's Oscars are revenge for the Academy's diversity efforts | View
Watch: 2019 Oscar nominations announcedThe 2019 Oscar nominations have been announced by actors Kumail Nanjiani of The Big Short and Tracee Ellis Ross from ABC’s Black-ish.
Nazi's paintings now fund foundation for JewsThe Zurueckgeben foundation also encourages Germans to take stock of the more mundane items in their households and question where they came from.
'Green Book' wins top feature film award from the Producers GuildThe drama-comedy topped nine other movies, including "BlacKkKlansman," "Black Panther" "Bohemian Rhapsody," "Crazy Rich Asians" and "Vice."
Meaningful ways to celebrate Martin Luther King Day
Colombian "Transformer" amuses commuters at red lightsIt's not easy making a living in Colombia where the unemployment rate has now risen to nine percent and sometimes a bit of creativity is called for.
Banking on Moldova's farmersAs part of a special Business Planet filmed in Moldova, Euronews spoke to Antoine Gabizon, President of Mobiasbanca - the bank is participating in the 'Fruit Garden of Moldova' initiative. The project aims to make it easier for small and medium sized enterprises in Moldova to gain access to finance.
Kustendorf festival celebrates best of independent cinema
Berlusconi announces candidacy for European electionsBerlusconi announces candidacy for European elections due to "sense of responsibility"
Futuristic spaceship theme park opens in CrimeaCrimea is usually seen as a tourist destination in the post-Soviet space, with its many beaches and picturesque mountains. The resort town of Alushta, replete with mountains and beaches, now has something more unusual to boast.
'Space snowman' spins like a propeller in dramatic new NASA animationUltima Thule is the most distant object ever explored by humans.
Fire department rescues child from icy pondEmergency responders rescued a boy after he fell through an icy pond in Illinois
The film festival halfway up a mountain
Up-beat and down to earth: Cleveland, Ohio
Getting to know singer-songwriter Foy Vance
More than three coins in this fountain: but where's the money going?
DNA pioneer stripped of honorary tiles over racist comments
The week that was: blurred lines between reality and fantasy | View
Journalist blackmailed over sex tape wins case against AzerbaijanKhadija Ismayilova was filmed by hidden cameras in her own apartment after working on Panama-leaks story about ruling family.
Crowdfunding wars: Police campaign reaches €1 million
Ashley Judd's sexual harassment claim against Weinstein thrown out again
The Boston Globe's Mike Rezendes speaks to Euronews on Archbishop of Lyon trial
Coup bid ends with plotters killed, hostages freed in oil-rich GabonThe West African country has been ruled for more than half a century by President Ali Bongo and his father, Omar, who died in 2009.
UK: MPs urge police to improve response to abusive protesters
50-year-old French author says women his age too old to loveYann Moix, an award-winning French author made the comments in an interview with Marie Claire magazine.
Golden Globes disappoint with upsets like 'Green Book.' Here's the silver lining | View
Trump-appointed judge defends Mueller, scolds lawyer for Russian firm"You have undermined your credibility in this courthouse," Judge Dabney Friedrich said. "Knock it off."
Crowdfunding campaigns set up for French police and detained ex-boxer
Soldiers announce coup 'to restore democracy' to GabonPresident Ali Bongo's family has ruled the oil-producing West African country for nearly half a century. He is receiving medical treatment in Morocco.
In pictures: Golden Globes 2019Take a look at some of the best pictures from the 76th Golden Globes Awards.
Full list of Golden Globes winners
Trump's dystopia is nothing like 'Blade Runner' or 'The Running Man'
Argentine football legend Maradonna leaves hospital
The week that was: goodbye to 2018 but what next for 2019? | View
No Comment of the WeekRevellers across the world rang in the New Year this week. Fireworks lit up the skies over Auckland as New Zealand became one of the first countries to enter 2019.
Cumberbatch's Brexit movie explores voter anger, and causes some, too
Dust devil takes New South Wales paraglider for a terrifying rideAn experienced paraglider had a shocking encounter with a dust devil while preparing for a flight in Australia
German cinema controversy over free screening of Schindler's List
Watch : Spectacular dust storm arrives in Australia on New Years EveA massive dust storm hovered over central New South Wales in Australia on New Year's eve (December 31)
Likely no foreign nationals among dead in fatal Denmark train crashDenAt least eight people were killed in a train accident on a bridge in Denmark on Wednesday, police on the island of Fyn have said. Authorities added it's likely no foreign nationals are among the casualties.
Mexican mayor gunned down after being sworn inGov. Alejandro Murat confirmed the killing of Tlaxiaco Mayor Alejandro Aparicio Santiago via his Twitter account Tuesday.
Exclusive: Netflix poaches CFO from Activision Blizzard - source
Hollywood actors ranked by profit
Netflix's radical 'Black Mirror' movie may forever change how we experience TV | ViewThis weekend’s major release introduces an entirely new way to experience entertainment.
Who is your winner of discontent? A look back at a year of protests
U.K. recognizes cave rescue divers and a Monty Python member in Queen's honors listThe various honors will be bestowed by Queen Elizabeth II or senior royals next year.
Acclaimed Israeli author Amos Oz dies at 79His works included "Black Box," ''In the Land of Israel," and "A Tale of Love and Darkness," a 2002 memoir that was also adapted into a film starring Natalie Portman.
Israeli author Amos Oz dies at 79
Our favourite pictures of the year: How many of them can you identify?A good picture, as the idiom suggests, is often worth a thousand words.
Gone but not forgotten: A look back at Europeans who died in 2018A look back at some of the notable people that died across Europe this year
Political shifts and Chemnitz: Germany’s year in review
Man who accused Spacey of sexual assault may have filmed alleged gropingPolice documents released in connection with an alleged groping by Kevin Spacey at a Nantucket restaurant in 2016 suggest the victim captured some of the incident on video.
Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg released from hospital after lung surgeryThe 85-year-old justice said in August that she would like to remain on the Supreme Court for another five years.
Watch: The best of Euronews' No Comment videos from 2018From the horrors of war in Syria to tuna tossing in Australia and mocking May to deadly earthquakes in Indonesia, these are the best No Comment videos from 2018.
Five stories to know about today
Spanish grandmother makes film poster for Disney using Microsoft Paint
Watch: Car rams its way out of Tesco parking lot after booze theft bidPolice are looking for a vehicle and its occupants after they ram into others to escape a supermarket car park.
Kevin Spacey faces felony charge for allegedly groping teen at Nantucket bar
Trumped! 12 times the president knocked big news off the front page12 times the president knocked big news off the radar in 2018
Wrestler's being forced to cut his dreadlocks sparks civil rights probe"My opinion is that this was a combination of an abuse of power, racism, and just plain negligence," said Olympic wrestler Jordan Burroughs.
U.S. ambassador to Germany accuses Der Spiegel of anti-American biasThe claim against Der Spiegel comes after a journalist fabricated details in stories, including one about the kind of town that propelled President Trump to victory.
America is abandoning the Syrians whose lives were destroyed by ISISIf the world turns away, ISIS could come back. And everything Syrians have worked for will be destroyed again.
‘C’est ça l’amour’ takes top prize at Les Arcs Film Festival‘C’est ça l’amour’ takes top prize at Les Arcs Film Festival
The week that was: how one individual can change the world | View
NGOS sue French government over not doing enough to tackle climate chaFour NGOs including Oxfam and Greenpeace have decided to take the first act of "a climate justice action" against the French State.
Take a look around the Les Arcs Film Festival
European filmmakers at Les Arcs fear Brexit is holding them back
30 years since Lockerbie disaster killed 270 people
'Aquaman' raises serious environmental questions but few solutions
The Deauville experienceWe checked in at Hotel Barrière Le Normandy for a two-day break, a couple of hours away from Paris.
"Another Day of Life" tells the animated story of the Angolan WarThis year's Best European Animated movie takes an unconventional look at one of Africa's bloodiest conflicts.
Japanese project safeguards Egypt's ancient treasuresGlobal Japan visits the soon to be completed Grand Egyptian Museum in Cairo to see first hand how Japanese experts are helping to preserve Egypt's priceless artifacts.
Film ‘Industry Village’ in Les Arcs celebrates successFilm ‘Industry Village’ in Les Arcs celebrates success
Cold War takes top honors at 2018 European Film Awards in SevilleSeville hosted the 2018 European Film Awards, with Polish director Pawel Pawlikowski's Cold War winning 5 awards including best film and best director
Valeria Bruni-Tedeschi talks frankly about women in filmValeria Bruni-Tedeschi talks frankly about women in film
Zebra races through German city after escaping from circusFour zebras escaped from a Christmas circus and were seen racing through Dresden, Germany on Monday (December 17) before being caught by police, German media reported.
Penny Marshall, famed actress and comedian, dead at 75Marshall broke ground as the first female director to gross $100 million with "Big" in 1988," which starred Tom Hanks.
Emerging production talent given cash boost at Les Arcs Film Festival
'Dark Crystal' prequel announces cast of famous voices, including Hamill, Pegg, Key"It is humbling to see so many truly gifted actors join 'The Dark Crystal' universe," said Lisa Henson.
Focus on Poland at Les Arcs Film Festival
Before 'one small step': How Apollo 8 became our first true moon shotThe historic flight launched 50 years ago this week.
Model claims affair with Woody Allen as teen — but has 'no regrets'
European filmmakers compete for funding in Les Arcs
Shaking, not stirred: 007 has 'chronic alcohol problem' study finds
Evolution of the Les Arcs Film Festival as it marks its 10th editionThe event, which runs until 22 December 2018, brings together industry talent, and filmgoers from across Europe.
Meet the Polish paramilitaries who look beyond Russia for motivationWhat attracts young Poles to paramilitary organisations? As it turns out, it’s not a fear of Russia. At least, not only. Close to the Polish-Lithuanian border, in a small town called Augustów, local youths train inside a school building to become paramilitary soldiers.
Peace protesters face hostility in MoscowCalls to end war in Ukraine and free political prisoners outside the FSB headquarters are shouted down by angry pro-Russian Serbs, who attempt to disrupt meeting and jostle journalists.
Cold War is the big winner at the European Film Awards in SevilleThe Seville ceremony was the 31st edition of the awards.
European Film Awards: the winnersLooking for something to watch over Christmas?
'Mary Queen of Scots' is a period piece with #MeToo undertones | View
Hikers capture eruption of Guatemala's Fuego Volcano
A diverse Spider-Man is possible. But Marvel's not convinced | View
A tour of the Met's archives and treasures
Publisher of National Enquirer admits paying hush money to help TrumpAMI worked "to ensure that the woman did not publicize damaging allegations" about Trump ahead of the 2016 election.
Loosening that feeling of human superiorityThis 20 minute art experience welcomes you into an Avatar-like rainforest.
Why you need to read this article slowlyWe read more than ever before. But the way that we read may not necessarily mean we learn or know more.
Ex-Trump lawyer Michael Cohen sentenced to three years in prisonEx-Trump lawyer Michael Cohen sentenced to three years in prison
'Cold War' leads European Film Awards nominations
Empty chair at ceremony for Oleg Sentsov at European Parliament
Andy Serkis reprises Gollum character to mock May's Brexit planAndy Serkis' new Brexit parody is precious...
Intimacy coordinators work on-set to keep actors safe during sex scenes"Before Weinstein, the idea of being able to say no in a positive way, wasn't really a part of the narrative in the industry," one expert said.
'Yellow vests': French minister tells Trump 'stop meddling'
Can the Oscars regain relevance?
Police arrest 400 'yellow vest' protestors in Brussels
Egypt investigating couple over nude photos atop Great PyramidEgyptian authorities are investigating images of Danish photographer Andreas Hvid having sex on top of  the Great Pyramid of Giza.
US President Trump's former lawyer won't be spared prison timeThat's the view of New York prosecutors, who pointed out in court filings, that Cohen hadn't entered into a cooperation agreement with their office.
Sailors spot dolphins feeding on bio-luminescent plankton in the Med
Georgia exhibits millennia-old golden gobletA golden goblet dating back to the second Millennium BC is the star of the show at Georgia's National Museum.
The Best Christmas MarketsOur round-up of eco-friendly christmas markets promoting sustainable living in Europe to attend this December.
Anger over video of French student protesters arrested on their knees
Court ruling rekindles Spanish anger over the definition of 'rape'
Tom Cruise wants you to stop using 'motion smoothing' on your TVYou may not even know the feature is enabled, but Tom Cruise wants people watching his films at home to be aware of the "motion smoothing" setting on their televisions.
Luke Skywalker's lightsaber could fetch $200,000 at auctionLuke Skywalker's lightsaber could fetch $200,000 at auction
Marvel Avengers STATION experience opens in LondonMarvel Avengers STATION experience opens in London
Where to watch free screenings of European films from 3-7 DecemberAround 50 free screenings of European films will take place across 34 EU cities this week — here's where you can catch them.
Egyptian actress to be tried for wearing a dress that showed her legsRania Youssef appeared at the closing ceremony of a film festival in Cairo wearing a see-through dress that revealed the entirety of her legs.
UK issues military alert after Russian TV crew caught secretly filming
May has tough messages for fellow G20 leadersBritish prime minister doesn't want domestic troubles to undermine her position as a global leader.
Giant inflatable Santa blocks traffic in UKDrivers in Cambridgeshire, UK, were held up by a festive roadblock on Tuesday — a giant inflatable Santa that had broken free of its moorings.
Bobby Brown files lawsuit against Showtime and BBC over Whitney Houston documentaryThe film has an 86 percent rating on Rotten Tomatoes, with one critic saying it "makes you want to reach right into the screen and tell Whitney Houston to draw herself back from the abyss."
Quincy Jones honoured in Hollywood handprint ceremonyJones is the most Grammy-nominated artist of all time, with a total of 79 nominations. He has had 27 wins.
Way of the Orbán: Street fighting men get to know each other
Italian film director Bernardo Bertolucci dies aged 77asdasd
Europe briefing: Four stories to know about todayEuronews looks back at the biggest stories from around Europe this morning.
Plundered statue reignites debate about museum relics"We are just a body. You, the British people, have our soul ... You have kept him for 150 years. Just give us some months."
British film director Nicholas Roeg dies at 90His most famous film was Don't Look Now in 1973 which starred Julie Christie and Donald Sutherland.
Paris con artist who charged €247 for a taxi ride is jailedThe defendant was not a registered taxi driver and prevented his victims from getting out without paying
Will ExoMars be the mission to find life on Mars?
French anti-terror laws are robbing people of their freedom  | View
French court says posters showing woman tied to train tracks are legalA French court has ruled that posters showing a woman tied to train tracks "do not promote violence against women".
The art of recycling
Maltese Marvel: Valletta shows off its cultural sideIn this episode of Go Europe we take you to the Maltese port of Valletta, European Capital of Culture 2018.
The problem with the new Fantastic Beasts is that JK Rowling wrote it
'Butch Cassidy' screenwriter William Goldman dies at 87
This is solving unexpected environmental problemsThe art of reusing shipping containers.
Victory for conservationists as rare Mountain gorilla population risesThe mountain gorilla has now been declared by conservationists as not critically endangered.
Taiwanese puppeteer fights to rescue declining artAn 87-year-old man teaches puppetry to prevent the ancient art from dying.
Review: Thessaloniki International Film FestivalThe curtain falls on the 59th edition of the Thessaloniki International Film Festival.
Tikopia: take a step inside a remote civilizationA documentary about a 3,000-year-old civilization.
Raw Politics: Brexit decision, Lux Prize and internet trollsThe UK Cabinet meets to decide whether to back May's draft Brexit deal while environmental activism is highlighted in the European Parliament.
Japanese man 'marries' virtual reality character
The Brief: Italy standoff, Navalny and Film prizeIn this edition of the Brief the EU responds to the Italy budget plans, Kremlin critic Navalny is allowed out of Russia to attend court in Strasbourg, and Woman at War wins the European parliament's Lux Film prize.
To coin a phone: Russian fills tub with change to buy latest iPhone XSShoppers were sent scrambling to capture the remarkable scene: a group of men heaving a coin-filled bath into a shop to buy the latest iPhone.
Woman at War wins LUX Film prizeWoman at War wins LUX Film prize
Czech out? PM Babis told to resign after son’s ‘sent to Crimea’ claim
Stan Lee was a man, not a hero. But he leaves behind a radical legacy
Watch: Russians dress up as a bus to cross vehicle-only bridgeFour people decided to pose as one big yellow bus while attempting to cross a vehicle-only bridge.
Stan Lee: tributes pour in for comic legend
Stars from Marvel movies and TV shows react to Stan Lee's deathTributes to the comic book legend poured in on social media.
Christmas ad ban petition attracts 660,000 signaturesPeople have flocked to sign a petition calling for British regulators to overturn a ban on a television advert about the impact of palm oil production.
Stan Lee, creator of legendary Marvel comic book superheroes, dies at 95
Portrait of World War One soldier engraved on UK beachA portrait of a World War One soldier was carved onto the sands of Northern Ireland's Murlough beach on Sunday to mark the centenary of armistice day.
Douglas Rain, voice of HAL in '2001,' dies at 90Rain's sinuous, detached reading of HAL's lines made the computer's murders of four astronauts all the more shocking.
Walt Disney's 'The Nutcracker and the Four Realms' premieres in Europe
A sneak peek at the must-see looks from the Victoria's Secret Fashion ShowYour first look at the sexiest show of the year.
Trump asked National Enquirer CEO to help campaign by silencing womenThe revelation is contained in a lengthy and highly detailed Wall Street Journal article about Trump's alleged involvement in the hush money payoffs.
Three fine movies compete for Lux PrizeThe winner will be announced from the finalists next week in the 11th year of the prize, awarded by the European Parliament to reward movies that deal with European integration, and how the continent really is, today.
‘The Mountain’ wins World’s Ultimate Strongman and talks Game of Thrones spinoffsGame of Thrones star Hafthor Bjornsson has won the World’s Ultimate Strongman (WUS) competition in Dubai.
Netflix announces boost to European content
Watch: Mickey Mouse turns 90
Watch: When freestyle motocross meets drone filmingChampion freestyle motocross rider Tom Pages was filmed via drone doing all sorts of tricks in Spain.
Watch: Trapped bus passenger films landslide in PhilippinesA woman trapped in a bus filmed falling rocks and trees being uprooted by a landslide on Sunday in Benguet, a remote mountainous region on the Luzon island in the Philippines.
Twitter users spoof Election Day with meme comparing 2016 to 2018A host of Twitter users are exemplifying their feelings about heading to the polls in a form the social media platform does best: memes.
The Spice Girls reunion tour is finally happening but without Posh
Rome remembers 'Black Saturday'The Italian capital remembers the 1943 raid of the Ghetto or Rome as Germany prepares to mark the 80th anniversary of the Kristallnacht.
Italian woman stands-up to anti-immigrant comments on metro | #TheCube
French ranked bottom in EU for level of EnglishA new report says France has the lowest level of English proficiency of any European Union country, while Swedes were ranked the best internationally.
Canada’s resettlement of refugees: Potential lessons for Europe
Queen biopic 'Bohemian Rhapsody' has no idea what made Freddie Mercury
Fire breaks out after ferry collides with crane at Barcelona portA ferry collided with a crane at the port of Barcelona on Wednesday (October 31), causing the crane to fall over and start a fire, eyewitness video showed.
Over 100 arrested in France after police ‘purge’ call goes viralPolice reportedly deployed 15,000 officers across the country in anticipation of violence on Halloween.
British village outraged over pro-Trump midterm campaign 'smear'Residents of a village in Essex, United Kingdom, have expressed anger over a photo used in a Republican campaign advertisement.
Paris Pumpkin Penalty! Footballers get into Halloween spiritStars at French football giants Paris Saint Germain got the fright of their lives as the club got into the Halloween spirit.
Designer bar soapHandcrafted, soft and stunning.
Hungarian court aquits camerawoman who tripped and kicked migrants
Comic Con festival opens in ParisComic book fans descended on Paris on Friday for the opening of the Comic Con festival.
Comets and asteroids may be spreading life across the galaxyAre germs from outer space the source of life on Earth?
"Another fine mess!": 'Stan and Ollie' movie pays homage to comedy double actThe movie had its world premiere in London, closing the London Film Festival. Critics have been raving about Steve Coogan and John C. Reilly's performances.
"Bohemian Rhapsody" film critics: 'bites the dust'Ten years in the making, it sparked controversy in May following the release of an initial trailer that was accused of downplaying the singer’s sexuality. But Queen guitarist Brian May says fans will enjoy the movie.
Man arrested trying to steal Britain's Magna Carta at Salisbury CathedralA man was arrested after he tried to steal the British charter, signed in 1215.
Iconic island reopens after six monthsThe Philippines' Boracay island is officially open to business, but now it's sustainable.
Oleg Sentsov - a symbol of resistance in Ukraine
Jailed Ukrainian filmmaker Oleg Sentsov wins EU prizeThe Ukrainian filmmaker was arrested in 2014 and sentenced to 20 years in jail on terrorism charges, which he denies.
The desperate and neglected animals at Europe’s ‘worst zoo’
Watch: Scaffolding collapses in Antwerp, one dead, one injuredScaffolding collapsed outside the Belgian city of Antwerp's central station, killing one and injuring another, according to police.
Sweden's National Museum reopensRestored by two Scandic architecture practices and with interiors by New York's Joel Sanders, the National Museum has been buffed, plumped and re-animated.
'I can't take all this money': Waitress splits $10,000 tip with her co-workersA local YouTube star left the generous tip after ordering two waters.
Europe briefing: Five stories to know about todayEuronews brings you the latest news and updates as it happens this morning.
Fair and sustainable fine jewelleryFrom empowered responsible artisanal and small-scale mining organizations to your jewellery box.
Ryanair racial hate crime man is identified by police
Saudi king and crown prince meet murdered journalist's familyA friend of the Khashoggi family told The Associated Press that Salah, one of Khashoggi's sons, has been under a travel ban since last year.
Jane Fonda honoured at the 10th Lumiere Film FestivalFonda visited the city for the first time in 50 years, and the city opened its doors wide to the American icon.
European Commissioner Mariya Gabriel outlines new European film initiativeThe commissioner speaks to euronews' Isabelle Kumar on the new European Film Directory.
French teachers share their stories of harassment and abuse at school
Watch: ‘Headless chicken monster’ discovered by new photo technologyAustralian researchers have filmed an unusual sea cucumber in the Southern Ocean using deep-sea cameras and hope it can help a conservation drive.
Lumière Film Festival wraps up in Lyon
‘Headless chicken monster’ discovered by new photo technologyFor the first time, a deep-sea swimming sea cucumber, Enypniastes eximia, nicknamed the 'headless chicken monster', has been filmed in the Southern Ocean off East Antarctica.
Europe briefing: eight stories to know about todayHere is our afternoon round-up of key stories to know about in Europe so far today.
Rome Film Festival: Cate Blanchett shines
Jane Fonda honoured in the birthplace of cinema
Meet the man behind 2001: A Space Odyssey's visual effects50 years on, one of the key players behind the sci-fi classic 2001: A Space Odyssey has rewatched his visual effects work alongside an audience of 2,000 people in the French city of Lyon.
Is the Khashoggi disappearance a catalyst?  | Euronews AnswersEuronews talked to Professor Scott Lucas of Birmingham University on Middle East relations as the story of missing Journalist Jamal Khashoggi unfolds.
Lumière Film Festival: Javier Bardem shines
Stormy lost her suit against Trump, but she has another against his ex-lawyer. What's it about?Legal analysis: The porn star's case against Michael Cohen involves a non-disclosure agreement she signed.
'I would have been dead' says Crimea school attack headmistress
What’s it like to be struck by lightning? | NBC Left Field
Crimea: Student ‘kills himself’ after deadly gun and bomb rampage
Trump calls Stormy Daniels 'horseface' after judge dismisses her suitThe porn star's attorney Michael Avenatti shot right back, calling the president a "disgusting misogynist and an embarrassment."
Before and after pictures show the shocking impact of France's floodsThe Aude department in southwestern France remained on red alert on Tuesday after devastating floods swept the region around Carcassonne.
Red carpet opening for Lumiere Film Festival
Is Lyon's public transport operator implementing a 'kindness tax'?'Solidarity is not a crime,' argued protesters in Lyon who said the city's public transport network is imposing a €150 fine on people who give their tickets to other passengers
Judge dismisses Stormy Daniels' defamation suit against TrumpTrump's tweet calling a sketch of a man who allegedly threatened Daniels "a total con job" was constitutionally protected, the judge says.
Donald Tusk tears through Paris on a scooterEuropean Council President Donald Tusk impressed everyone by cruising through the Paris on a fashionable electric scooter.
Watch: Theresa May makes statement on Brexit in UK ParliamentMay's statement leads opposition leader Jeremy Corbyn to make 'Groundhog Day' comparison
Females star at London Film Festival
Inside the first underwater lounge"This bay is made of 19 coats of glass and it's 35 centimeters thick"
Mediterranean flash floods leave trail of death and devastation
"22 July" film concentrates on survivors
New York judge dismisses major charge in Weinstein criminal caseNew York Judge Jame Burke has dismissed a major charge in the criminal case against Harvey Weinstein, regarding accusations made by Lucia Evans. Evans was a 21-year-old college student in 2004 when she claims Weinstein forced her to perform oral sex when the met alone in his office
Lyon prepares to honour cinema at the latest Lumiere Festival
'Austin Powers' star Verne Troyer's death ruled a suicideThe actor's April death was caused by alcohol intoxication, putting his blood alcohol level more than three times the legal limit.
'You are very dangerous', Orban tells ErdoganThe Hungarian Prime Minister and Turkish President had an awkward exchange in front of reporters on Tuesday.
Will the Council of Europe become Putin’s trophy? | View
Documentary chronicles life of Yazidi activist and Nobel laureate Murad
Palu: Dramatic footage of Tsunami
El Gouna Film Festival brings regional & international stars to Egypt
Patrick Dempsey and Jean-Jacques Annaud present new TV series at the El Gouna Film FestivalDuring the second edition of the El Gouna Film Festival in Egypt, Grey’s Anatomy star Patrick Dempsey and French director Jean-Jacques Annaud presented a preview of their new television miniseries ‘The Truth About the Harry Quebert Affair’.
Egyptian actress Yousra reveals the most important lesson in her careerAward-winning Egyptian actress Yousra has more than 80 film and television credits to her name.
Owen Wilson describes toughest time of his career and reveals favourite film
Sylvester Stallone talks Creed II, Rambo V and reveals future plansHollywood legend Sylvester Stallone was feted with the Career Achievement Award during the second edition of the El Gouna Film Festival.
Girl, 8, dubbed 'Queen of Sweden' after pulling sword from lake
Top innovators talk creativity and change in Romania
Airline stands by purported interview with Drew BarrymoreThe article said the actress had failed relationships because her parents divorced.
Thai beach popularised by Di Caprio film to remain closed to touristsThai beach popularised by Di Caprio film to remain closed to tourists
Fresh blow to Macron as third French minister resigns
Prison break gangster on the run for 3 months caught by police
Boris Johnson mobbed by reporters as he arrives at Tory conferenceA journalist made reference the famous British comedy film Monty Python's Life of Brian, asking Johnson: "Are you the Messiah or just a very naughty boy?"
Torture in Russian jails - what we learned from the Makarov caseThe prisoner allegedly beaten by guards, which sparked an outcry and a criminal investigation, has been released by Russian authorities.
Watch: Interpol film shows how to recognise homemade explosivesAn award-winning film by Interpol shows first responders how to recognise possible homemade explosives
New York Film Festival kicks off with period drama 'The Favourite'
Spain's most prestigious film festival winners
El Gouna international film festival wraps
Euronews pays a visit to Iran's 'secret atomic warehouse'To investigate the Israeli PM's claims that Iran was harboring a secret nuclear warehouse outside Tehran, Euronews correspondent Javad Montazeri went there to see for himself.
Woman strikes Lindsay Lohan live on Instagram during ‘attempted kidnapping’
German energy giant clears climate protesters from Hambach forest
The art of doing nothing in BodrumA step-by-step explainer of 'farniente Instagram posting' for dummies
Photographer Semra Sevin on the power of beautySemra underlines the concept of diversity, and her exploration translates into profound studied subjects, deep meditation and pompous photography installations
'Mutti', 'The Revenant' and 'Viktator'— what's your leader's nickname?Euronews journalists explain nicknames for EU leaders
Elon Musk wanted to impress girlfriend with $420 stock price: SEC
Jobless man told by Macron to 'cross the street' for work finds job
French rapper robbed as video 'provokes riot' near LyonYamine L'artiste (YL) lost his phone and bank card and ended up in custody after his attempt to film a video brought violent scenes near Lyon.
Watch: Seal slaps kayaker's face with octopus in New ZealandIn the footage, the seal can be seen launching itself out of the water wielding an octopus in its mouth and striking the unsuspecting kayaker across the face.
Dad arrested for putting boy in trunk says it was social experimentBoguslaw Matlak told police he was looking to become an "internet sensation."
Danish submarine inventor loses sentencing appeal for murdering reporter Kim WallIn Denmark, a life sentence equates to 16 years on average, but can be extended.
Turner Prize nomineesThe works of the nominees for this year's UK Turner Prize are on display at the Tate Britain in London with the emphasis very much on video
Louisiana soldier who detonated chemical weapon sentenced to 11 yearsThe blast set off by 24-year-old Ryan Keith Taylor last year emitted chlorine gas, badly injuring two investigators.
A fashion illustration renaissanceCurator of Drawing on Style, Connie Gray, and two of the featured illustrators, Bil Donovan and Jason Brooks, explain why this year’s show is more significant than ever.
Passengers delayed at Geneva airport treated to impromptu concertPhotographer Pascal Britz who filmed the performance, wrote on his Facebook page: “This is what happens when classical musicians wait for a delayed flight at 10:00 pm.”
Spanish film "The Kingdom" at San Sebastian Film FestivalAward-winning Spanish director Rodrigo Sorogoyen unveils his latest work at San Sebastian Film Festival
Snapchat addict sentenced to 14 years for manslaughterAs Safi "lay dying after being stabbed, her first thought was to capture the moment for social media."
Belarusian film Crystal Swan takes the Grand Prix at the Almaty Film FestivalThe film is set in the post-Soviet Belarus of the 1990s where young Evelina is desperate to get to Chicago and earn her living as a professional house DJ.i
Egypt's second El Gouna Film Festival opens on the Red Sea
Indiana Jones' hat, Han Solo's jacket go under the hammerHow much would you pay for a piece of movie history?
Theresa May appeals to EU leaders over 'unacceptable' Brexit demandsThe UK prime minister has appealed to EU leaders meeting in the Austrian city to drop “unacceptable” Brexit demands, as pressure intensifies to reach a deal.
Ashley Judd can pursue Weinstein defamation case, judge saysJudd, who alleges the disgraced producer blackballed her, won't be able to move forward with her sexual harassment claim.
Animal rescuer braves North Carolina floods to save stranded dogsAn animal rescue volunteer came to the aid of a number of dogs that had been left stranded in floods in North Carolina after Hurricane Florence.
Film festival offers North Koreans rare opportunity to see foreign filmsThe 16th Pyongyang Film Festival opened on Wednesday, offering North Koreans a rare opportunity to watch foreign films.
Almaty launches its International Film FestivalFestival pitches itself as major forum for co-productions in the former Kazakh capital, the cradle of Soviet cinema with a long tradition of filmmaking.
US actor Jack Black receives star on Hollywood Walk of Fame'Kung Fu Panda' and 'Jumanji' actor Jack Black jokingly announced his retirement on Tuesday (September 18) as he received a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame.
Europe briefing: 5 things to know about todayEuronews brings you the latest news and updates as it happens this morning.
200,000 rally around French bus driver who slapped teen boyHis colleagues say the teenager insulted the driver after dangerously crossing the street in front of the bus.
Raw Politics: WTF France creator Paul Taylor on EU stereotypesRaw Politics: WTF France creator Paul Taylor on EU stereotypes
What's behind the Salvini-Asselborn migration row? | Euronews answersThe ministers from Italy and Luxembourg have continued their war of words which flared up when Matteo Salvini likened African immigrants to slaves.
Nicole Kidman in new film about gay conversion therapyNicole Kidman's latest movie 'Boy erased' had its premiere at the Toronto International Film festival. The film looks at the mother of a son forced to participate in a church-supported gay conversion program in a small American town.
House GOP 'screwed' as bad political numbers pile on TrumpAnalysis: The pre-midterms mood in the majority ranks is grim with President Donald Trump's approval ratings slipping and the poll edge for Democrats increasing.
Meet the Afghan Charlie ChaplinMeet the Afghan Charlie Chaplin
Pasolini restrospective in screening seriesHe’s the filmmaker behind classics like "120 days of Sodom", and now Pier Pasolini has a retrospective called "The Great Heretic". It will screen 17 restored versions of his films in Athens, Greece. But how relevant is Pasolini today?
State of the Union: Juncker waves difficult year away
Robert Redford's final film at TIFFRobert Redford's final film premieres at Toronto International Film Festival
Deauville pays emotional tribute to Morgan Freeman44th American Film Festival wraps up with top prizes for debut films.
MOTELX International Horror Film Festival returnsMOTEL- Lisbon International Horror Film Festival returns
Mexican drama 'Roma' wins Golden Lion at Venice Film Festival
"Operation Finale" pits Kingsley against Isaac in the story of the Eichmann captureThe story of the Israeli secret service's daring 1960's covert operation in Argentina has been given the Hollywood twist.
Britain vs Russia on Novichok attacks: who do you believe?
Fast news: The week in a minuteWatch Euronews’ Fast News, where the most significant stories of the past few days are packed into 60 seconds.
Oscars delays introduction of controversial 'popular film' categoryThe film academy said the new prize "merits further study."
American actor Burt Reynolds dies, aged 82American actor Burt Reynolds dies aged 82.
Actor Burt Reynolds has died aged 82Actor Burt Reynolds has died aged 82, according to The Holywood Reporter, citing manager
Watch: Donald Tusk just came out with an action-movie style trailerThe video, with dramatic music, highlights what's to come this autumn.
Cronenberg awarded Golden Lion at Venice Film FestivalThe 75 year old Canadian director was recognised for a lifetime of achivement.
Ukrainian Fashion Week: women designersSince the 2014 revolution, a new generation of women designers came forward.
Ukraine's fashion identity got revivedFashion has had its own revolution in Ukraine in the last few years.
Stop giving Steve Bannon's white nationalist nonsense a platform already | View
Filmmaker Tyler Perry announces lawsuit against former sheriff's deputyFilm producer Tyler Perry joined attorney Benjamin Crump on Tuesday to announce a civil lawsuit that accuses an ex-lawman of first-degree murder.
LA prosecutors decline to file sex abuse charges against Spacey, SeagalProsecutors said that the statute of limitations had expired in the cases, but one other case against each actor is still under review.
Orson Welles' unfinished movie presented at Venice Film FestivalOrson Welles shot "The Other Side of the Wind" in the early 1970s but gave up on it, leaving behind 100 hours of footage when he died in 1985.
Uruguay's humble president featured at Venice Film FestivalAs the president of Uruguay Jose Mujica gave most of his salary to charity and lived an austere lifestyle whilst in office.
Biopic looks at Van Gogh's creative process
Who plays Dr. Klemperer?A remake of the cult classic "Suspiria" stars Tilda Swinton - twice
DEPARDIEU STRONGLY DENIES RAPE ALLEGATIONS
French actor Gerard Depardieu denies rape allegationsFrench actor Gerard Depardieu denies rape allegations
2018 Venice Film Festival: Day 2
Controversy as only one woman director included in Venice Film Festival
"First Man" opens 75th Venice Film Festival
Lack of gender equality at 75th Venice Film Festival
Netflix has six films in this year's Venice Film Festival
Norwegian woman 'shot twice by Israeli soldiers during protests'The Israeli Defense Forces said the activist "stood among the rioters whilst they carried out violence against the security forces", adding that they would investigate the incident.
Watch: Fancy-dress paragliders in BoliviaSpeaking of the competition, paraglider Gustavo Robledo said the adventurers "strive to make people enjoy the show".
Watch: Costume-clad paragliders descend over the AndesThe "Bumblebee" character from the franchise "Transformers" and the flying house from the Pixar produced film "Up" were among the costumes in the skies.
British dancer Lindsay Kemp dies
German army angers gamers with ‘tone-deaf’ adsThe Bundeswehr has sparked a backlash after unveiling posters comparing gaming to real-life conflict for a recruitment campaign.
Photographer Anton Kalashnikov shares his sophisticated B&W photosHis love for photography started at an early age and his passion has spawned a sophisticated collection of ordinary, but fantastic black and white photographs.
Watch: Artist creates cameras made of woodThis Russian artist blends his passion for photography and woodwork to develop cameras with shells made of driftwood, pebbles and shells.
Social media users mock Dragnea's assassination claimsThe leader of Romania's ruling party said unidentified assassins had targeted him. The police responded that they weren't aware.
Trump 'calm' for now as WH allies brace for potential meltdownPresident Donald Trump hasn't lashed out following the convictions of Michael Cohen and Paul Manafort — but sources say the West Wing remains on alert.
Passenger films moment plane’s engine catches fire after takeoffFootage of passengers reacting as a plane’s engine bursts into flames, forcing it to make a U-turn back to the airport, has emerged on social media.
Europe briefing: 7 stories to know about todayLive news updates from Europe and beyond for August 22.
Volunteers translate English letters for imprisoned filmmaker Sentsov
Gordon Ramsay accused of faking drama by 'Kitchen Nightmares' restaurantA New Orleans eatery says the famed British chef exaggerated his experiences while filming.
Asia Argento denies "all sexual relations" with accuser
'Crazy Rich Asians' dazzles with $34 million five-day opening"This is one of those few projects that a whole studio comes together with lots of passion," Jeff Goldstein of Warner Bros. said
Instaquiz: your questions answeredInstaquiz: your questions answered
Plastic bottle raft helps highlight marine pollution problem in Italy
Mystery surrounds Stormy Daniels decision to withdraw from U.K. reality showPresident Donald Trump denies having an affair with the adult film star, but his lawyer admitted paying her $130,000.
NBC Left Field: Do protest marches really work?
‘I saw the car disappear into the clouds’: Genoa survivors speak out
Who are Russia's 'political prisoners'?The growing number of political and religious prisoners in Russia is concerning human rights organisations and NGOs in Russia and abroad.
UK cinemas to roll out 270-degree screens in theatresThey’ve tried 3D glasses, IMAX and 4DX, and now the UK cinema industry wants to introduce world-first “multi-projection cinema technology" to shake-up the movie theatre experience.
Legendary Soviet writer Eduard Uspensky dies in Moscow aged 80
Moment of Italian bridge collapse caught on camera
'Apocalyptic scene' as highway bridge collapses in Italian cityAn official warned "what seems like an immense tragedy" was unfolding.
Marilyn Monroe's famous white dress from *that* subway scene is up for auctionMarilyn Monroe's personal items are going up for exhibition at the Profiles in History auction house in Beverly Hills, California, on Aug. 18.
Disney casts straight actor Jack Whitehall in gay role, sparks debate
I was a violent white supremacist. I found a way out | View
German student’s visa not renewed in China 'after human rights film'
Israeli airstrikes flatten cultural centre in Gaza strip as Hamas seeks truce | The Cube
The Oscars cause upset throughout Hollywood as they add "popular film" to award categories
Watch: Volcanic eruption caught on camera … from a ski lift!This is the moment an aspiring film director enjoyed a front row seat for a volcanic eruption.
Overtourism: a growing global problem | View
Two far-away bombings 20 years ago set off the modern era of terrorMany Americans were paying closer attention to a president's personal scandal, but the destruction in Kenya and Tanzania was pivotal.
Funerals held for Russian journalists killed in CAR
Thousands march against spycam epidemic in South KoreaTens of thousands of South Korean women have been taking part in a mass protest in Seoul against secretly-filmed spycam pornography.
Russia tasks actor Steven Seagal with improving ties with US
The ones that got away: dramatic police chase on River Thames
Watch: Rhino attacks vehicle at safari parkThis is the terrifying moment a rhino attacked a vehicle at a safari park in Mexico.
Watch: Family diving trip becomes mission to rescue whale shark
Watch: Majorca beach evacuated after shark spotted near shore
Europe briefing: Five stories to know about todayEuronews brings you the latest news and updates as they happen this morning.
Documentary on Ed Sheeran highlights his creativity
Cher has redefined herself a dozen times, but always remained a true diva | ViewShe is an entertainer so durable and consistently excellent that we joke she'll outlast human civilization
Mass airport brawl between rap stars closes airport terminal in ParisMass airport brawl between rap stars Booba and Kaaris forces Paris terminal to close
Ideas and exploration at Venice Architecture Biennale
Europe briefing: Six stories to know about todayJoin us for live updates on the key stories for today, Wednesday, August 1.
Conspiracy theorists hijack YouTube results for A-listersThe video portal has been repeatedly criticized for not curtailing videos of conspiracy theories and false information on its platform.
Eyewitness videos capture horror of Greek wildfiresThe Greek government is facing criticism as the extent of the damage from the worst wildfires in recent memory becomes clear. Our correspondent Bryan Carter reports from Mati, where the land is scorched and many buildings are reduced to ashes.
Ortega: opposition protests are a US-led coup attempt
Police warn people against Kiki challenge after injuries reported
Israel frees Palestinian teen who became protest icon after viral videoThe teen was arrested after being filmed slapping and kicking Israeli soldiers in front of her home in the occupied West Bank.
Israel releases Palestinian teenager who struck soldier
The Tour de France winner who helped save hundreds of Jews
Italian National Hero made into an animation
Bavaria tightens borders amid German rethink on migrants
Photographer Lubo Domo's passion for the picture that says it allDomo is passionate about achieving that one picture that says it all, the one that, upon seeing it, makes you feel like you were there.
Game of Thrones actor highlight plight of Syrian refugeesGame of Thrones actor Liam Cunningham was reunited with a young syrian refugee he first befriended in Jordan in 2016
75th Venice Film Festival announces line-up
Afghanistan: 40 years of instability, is there hope for peace?Afghanistan: 40 years of instability, is there hope for peace?
Macron scandal continues with opposition criticising the President
Europe briefing: Five stories you need to know about todayEuronews brings you the latest news and updates as it happens this morning.
White Helmets squeezed by warring forces and global factionsWith the help of the West, members of the volunteer rescue force known as the White Helmets are fleeing Syria as Russian-backed forces gain ground.
Macron under increased pressure over bodyguard
Europe briefing: Six stories you need to know about todayEuronews brings you the latest news and updates as it happens this morning.
Collomb faces MPs' anger over handling of Benalla affairThe French Interior Minister has come under criticism from politicians for not immediately informing judicial officials of the incident after one of President Emmanuel Macron's bodyguards was filmed assaulting a protestor in May.
Summer festivals 2018Three European festivals to visit this year are the Globaltica World Cultures Festival in Poland, the Salzburg Festival in Austria and the Boom festival in Portugal highlighting diverse music and drama from around the world
Europe briefing: Five stories to know about todayHere are the five stories you need to know about on Monday, July 23.
France: Why the Benalla scandal is controversial for Macron
French president's aggressive bodyguard sparks first government scandalAlexandre Benalla, who heads Presidential Emmnauel Macron's security detail, was filmed hitting a young man and abusing a young woman on a street in Paris in front of police officers.
Afghanistan: Education is the key to the future of the country
Real-life 'Iron Man' launches in £340k flying suit at airshowThree days following the commercial launch of his £340,000 jet suit in partnership with department store chain Selfridges, amateur engineer Richard Browning was in Hampshire on Saturday to show off his creation before thousands at the biennial Farnborough International Airshow.
Fast news: The week in a minute
Disney boots director Gunn from 'Guardians of the Galaxy 3' for tasteless tweetsThe move comes ahead scheduled appearance by Gunn at San Diego Comic-Con.
Ryan Gosling in 'First Man' opens this years Venice Film Festival
France: Macrons aide is fired
Love and rockets: Inside Italy's Vega launcher factory
Sky is the limit for Comcast as it walks away from 21st Centry Fox bidComcast has abandoned its pursuit of 21st Century Fox's film and television assets, leaving Disney in pole position as the sole bidder. It said it would focus its attention on buying Sky instead.
Poland's post-apocalyptic "Old Town" festivalIt stages a live one hundred hour long action game where particpants role play, many of them clearly inspired by the cult dystopian film Mad Max.
New film shows human costs of capitalism, narcissism and greed
Hot lava smashes through roof of tourist boat 'leaving 23 injured'Hot lava burst from the ocean and crashed through the roof of a sightseeing boat near Hawaii on Monday, injuring 23 people.
Mamma Mia: Here We Go AgainIt's taken years to produce a sequel to the smash hit musical Mamma Mia
Macron brings wounded soldier into French dressing roomFrench president was animated during the game, but took time to console the losers and make one wounded soldier very happy.
Algeria stops forcing migrants into Sahara after widespread outrageThe North African nation was expelling migrants by the hundreds almost every week into the unforgiving desert, sometimes to their deaths.
Tom Cruise returns for another Impossible MissionThe sixth instalment of spy movie franchise "Mission: Impossible", which sees actor Tom Cruise leap from a military plane 25,000 feet above Paris, premiered on Thursday in the French capital.
Ingmar Bergman's work remembered on 100th anniversaryThe Swedish director is widely considered one of the greatest film-makers of all time and would have turned 100 years old this month.
Watch: Police helicopter chases drug smuggler onto Spanish beach
George Clooney injured in scooter accident in Italy
Writer attacked by mob who mistook her van for mythical 'black ambulance'A popular legend holds that black ambulances cruise the streets looking for children to murder in order to sell their organs to wealthy buyers in western Europe.
French filmmaker Claude Lanzmann dies aged 92French filmmaker and journalist Claude Lanzmann has died in Paris at age 92.
This is the only district in Europe where Roma are the majority
Beijing is their campus: Inside the Chinese capital’s life-changing study tours
Ten reasons the World Cup is the best sports championship
Croatian summer: your to do listA handy round up of new things to do, taste, see and experience this summer in Croatia.
Fashion shoot at WWII death camp in Croatia sparks outrageAn Australian company published a series of photos and videos taken on a trip to Eastern Europe earlier this year in which models are seen posing in sunglasses at sites including the Flower Memorial at Jasenovac, a World War II-era death camp.
Kidnappers maimed, 'put out' eye of Hollywood actor, indictment saysActor Joseph Capone had an unspecified body part maimed, his tongue cut and his eye 'put out' during the kidnapping, an indictment states.
British police reportedly investigating new allegations against Kevin SpaceyLondon's Metropolitan Police had previously confirmed three other investigations against the Oscar-winning actor.
Our sunny interview with Emma LairdBritish actress and model Emma Laird on where she will summer, favourite eateries and beauty routine.
53rd Annual Karlovy Vary International Film Festival
Notorious gangster escapes French prison by helicopterOne of France's most famous gangsters has escaped a prison in the Paris region by helicopter, according to local media.
Notorious gangster escapes French prison by helicopter
Great White shark spotted off Spanish coastA great white shark has been spotted near Spain's Balearic Islands for the first time in at least 30 years.
Summer movies to watchFind out about four films this summer
Photographer Imogen Forte's love for unrepressed movementBorn and raised in busy London, Forte's natural curiosity for the human experience is very present in her work. She likes to document private emotions in public spaces, portraying colourful but honest pictures.
Exclusive: The school the suicide bombers couldn’t shut
Afghan cameraman learns of nephew's death in suicide attack
Upset in Germany as team head home from Russia
Hollywood releases cartel sequel before Mexico's deadly electionThe run up to the election has been rife with violence and vote-buying schemes.
'New wolf pack' gang in Spain held over sex attack
One night at Le Fouquet’s in ParisOur stay in this iconic French brasserie, luxury family-owned hotel and confidential Parisian nightlife hotspot
French actor Gerard Depardieu gets Brussels city awardFrench actor Gerard Depardieu was awarded a medal by the city of Brussels on Monday (June 25).
Posters shame 'Wolf Pack' assailants as they return home
Stormy Daniels to meet with federal prosecutors in New York
'Jurassic World' sequel stomps to $150 million debutTogether, the dinosaur epic and "Incredibles 2" gave Hollywood its fourth-biggest weekend ever.
Game of Thrones stars Kit Harington and Rose Leslie marry in Scotland
The end of memes? Campaigners dismayed at European internet ruling
Mass rally in Madrid
Kaliningrad's World Cup facelift came at a priceResidents were forced off properties and protestors bullied off properties ahead of World Cup
Koko the 'talking' gorilla diesKoko - the gorilla said to have been able to communicate through sign language - has died at the age of 46.
San Fermin 'wolf pack' gang to be released on bail in SpainFive men sentenced to nine years in prison for sexually abusing an 18-year-old woman at Pamplona’s San Fermin bull-running festival in July 2016 are to be released on bail.
What's the risk from asteroids, and what's being done about it?
Mars dust storm throws Nasa rover into doubtMost of Mars is engulfed in a dust storm the likes of which has not been seen for over a decade.
'Jurassic World': Paleontologist who inspired Alan Grant role talks real-life dino scienceJack Horner explains dinosaur biology and behavior, and whether one day we could have pet dinos.
Cannes Lions festival: what about the lionesses?Cannes Lions festival: what about the lionesses?
Fox entertainment talent say they're 'disgusted' and 'embarrassed' over Fox NewsFox News regularly comes under attack for its news coverage, but criticism rarely makes its way back to 21st Century Fox.
Marvel could learn a lot from the way 'Incredibles 2' portrays adulthoodPixar's new animated sequel explores the idea that growing up doesn't mean you have to stop doing what you love.
Flashing lights in 'Incredibles 2' prompt health warningParts of the blockbuster movie may trigger a seizure in people with a certain condition.
Bill seeks to ban filming of Israeli soldiers in actionWatch the video to see five examples of when video footage has provoked condemnation or convictions of Israelis or Palestinians.
Russians throw 'Venetian Carnival' in floods to woo roadwork fixturesLocals decided to shed light on their town's problem in a humorous way.
The travel guide to Sibenik, CroatiaThis small seaside town located on the Dalmatian coastine is having a renaissance.
Did you know this about the World Cup's 32 teams?
Watch: Which three documents were given to Aquarius migrants in Spain?
Marseille: the summer 2018 mini guideA curated travel guide blending old and new spots to eat, see, shop and pamper like a local in the Mediterranean French city.
Stephen Hawking's voice will be broadcast into spaceThe voice of world-renowned physicist Stephen Hawking will be broadcast into space after his memorial service takes place later today.
Watch: Man's 'pothole swim' paves way for town's new road
AT&T wins: Judge approves $85.4 billion Time Warner acquisitionThe acquisition will create one of the most powerful companies in global media.
Joanna Stingray: The California girl that shot to fame in the USSRThis is a story about Joanna Stingray. A girl from California who found herself in 1980s Russia on the radar of the KGB and FBI for smuggling out underground Soviet music that Americans were never supposed to hear.
Trump showed Kim a video of the future - this is itWatch the video that shows Trump and Kim deciding the future of the world.
Restaurants honor Anthony Bourdain's memory by trying to help othersThe celebrated chef and TV host made an impact on legions of fans throughout his career.
Flying high? EU to vote on new drone rules
Anthony Bourdain's mother speaks out about his tragic deathGladys Bourdain said she saw no signs indicating her son might take his own life, and remembered him as a precocious child who "always had talent."
'Ocean's 8' opens with franchise-best $41.5 millionThe Sandra Bullock heist caper led at the box office on a weekend when the three top movies were all led by women.
Cyntoia Brown, sentenced at 16 to life in prison, pleas for mercyHer case has become a national rallying point for activists trying to reform the criminal justice system.
Dolly Parton's Netflix series is an overdue acknowledgement of the legend's impactParton was inducted into the Country Music Hall of Fame in 1999, before some of her youngest fans were born.
John Lasseter to leave Pixar after “missteps”
Shock at death of Anthony Bourdain aged just 61
Angel investors: Seed capital helps MENA female start-ups take flightThe MENA region’s entrepreneurship ecosystem is growing in size and stature thanks to business accelerator schemes, alternative financing and an expanding community of angel investors and professional mentors.
Celebrated chef and TV host Anthony Bourdain found dead in FranceCelebrity chef Anthony Bourdain has been found dead at his hotel in France, CNN said on Friday. He was 61.

	“It is with extraordinary sadness we can
Stormy Daniels' former lawyer countersuesKeith Davidson, who once represented the porn star, is now suing her, her current lawyer and President Trump's personal lawyer, Michael Cohen.
Stormy Daniels lawsuit: My old lawyer was a 'puppet' for Trump, CohenSuit claims the attorneys tried to arrange for her to appear on Sean Hannity's show and deny affair.
Nureyev Ballet wins major awards at Prix Benois
Argentina cancels World Cup warm-up in IsraelIt's after Palestinians accused Israel of using the high-profile fixture to underpin their disputed claim over Jerusalem.
Man begins swim from Japan to San FranciscoBen Lecomte, born in France and now living in Texas, has begun a swim estimated at 5,500 miles. He hopes to bring attention to pollution from plastics.
Watch: Dutch PM Rutte applauded after clearing up own coffee spillIs this something you can imagine the leader of your country doing?
Lufthansa drops Russia World Cup advert filmed in Ukraine
Liverpool goalkeeper had concussion during Champions League final
Immigrant who saved two children will not be forced to leave France
Cuban singer releases album at 87 years oldKnown as 'The Diva', Omara Portuondo shot to international fame through Wim Wenders documentary film about the Buena Vista Social Club in 1999.
Did this mattress company accidentally reveal Belgium’s World Cup rostDid this mattress company accidentally reveal Belgium’s World Cup roster?
Plane makes emergency landing on California streetSurveillance cameras captured video of a small plane landing in a residential area of Orange County as it approached the nearby airport
Geneva 'first European city' to probe the introduction of drone taxis
Walt Disney to release new Winnie the Pooh film
Migrants in the Alps: The dangerous trek to a new lifeOver a nearly two year period, more than 3,500 migrants have braved the Alps to seek asylum in France
Original Winnie-the-Pooh sketches for saleThe 1926 drawing about the Hundred Acre Wood is among them.
MAXXI Bulgari Art prize exhibition opensThe work of the three finalists in the MAXXI Bulgari Art prize will go on display in Rome on Friday.
Ailing Thai beach made famous by DiCaprio film gets tourist timeoutOnce a pristine Thai paradise, the secluded bay made famous by "The Beach" has been exhausted by mass tourism.
Harvey Weinstein indicted for rape
Pompeo's critical meetings to save Trump's North Korean summit
Film director Agnes Varda turns 90
Morgan Freeman's lawyer demands CNN retractionThe actor's lawyer calls the article "journalistic malpractice." CNN stands by its account.
Erdogan supporters force removal of controversial cover from French neSupporters of Erdogan near Avignon force an employee from a French billboard company to take down a contentious magazine cover featuring the Turkish president
'Solo' sputters with $83.3 million at box officeThere may be just too much "Star Wars" in our lives right now, experts say.
Denmark raises flags for crown prince's birthday thanks to viral Faceb
Bridging cultures: Ramadan opens doors and minds
MI6 says Bond myth hampering recruitment of women
Ukrainian filmmaker Sentsov says he may die during World CupImprisoned filmmaker Oleg Sentsov hopes the international community will use the World Cup in Russia to push President Vladimir Putin for the release of Ukrainians who human rights advocates say are held as political prisoners.
Movie producer Weinstein charged with rape, sex abuse against two wome
Cinema: New documentary film explores censorship on the internet
Morgan Freeman apolotises after assault claimAccording to CNN, the US film star is alleged to have assaulted one production assistant for months during filming of bank robbery comedy Going in Style
Disgraced movie mogul Weinstein to be arrestedHarvey Weinstein is expected to turn himself in to police in New York after a warrant was issued for his arrest
Au pair murder: Couple found guiltySophie Lionnet, 21, was tortured and killed by the couple who accused her of plotting against them with Boyzone member Mark Walton.
King of Comedy's items to go on auction in Las Vegas
The world's spying capital tilts toward Putin's RussiaA pro-Moscow party now has responsibility for Austria's intelligence services, raising fears that Western security secrets might be leaked to Russia.
Obamas sign deal with NetlixNetflix says working with Barack and Michelle Obama will give the former president and first lady a greater voice outside of the traditional public speaking.
"Hotel Artemis" premieres in Los AngelesJodie Foster describes her latest role as a nurse in "Hotel Artemis" as a "complete transformation."
Asia Argento delivers searing speech at Cannes against Weinstein
Japanese indie film Shoplifters wins top prize at CannesThe runner-up Grand Prix was awarded to U.S. director Spike Lee for his anti-racism film BlacKkKlansman
Film director Luc Besson accused of rapePolice in Paris are investigating a complaint filed by an actress in the French capital on Friday
Saudi Arabian women's driving activists arrested just weeks before ban is lifted
Cannes Film Festival: Palme d"Or goes to "Shoplifters," Hirokazu Kore-eda
There's support for silenced film makers at the Cannes Film Festival
Over 100 dead after passenger plane crashes in CubaA Boeing 737 plane has crashed just after take-off from Havana, Cuba, where 114 people were reported to have been on board
Cannes: migrant documentary-maker slams French state policies
A Chihuahua from an Italian movie " Dogman" won Palm Dog award at Cannes
Cannes' Directors Fortnight 50th anniversary
Chihuahua wins Palm Dog award at Cannes
2018 FIFA World Cup: the Euronews guide
Women challenge the status quo at the Cannes Film FestivalWomen often fill the frame at Cannes. On the red carpet, the camera lingers on them far longer than it does on men.

But this year, some women are challenging that image.
Rolando Villazón's passionate and energetic approach to directing
When will Chewbacca finally get the Star Wars respect he deserves?
Hamas says most of protesters slain in Gaza were its members
Short film asks for Syrian fighting to stop for World Cup
Britain's Prince William paints for GrenfellBritain's Prince William rolled up his sleeves on Tuesday (May 15) to help paint a wall in a new boxing club, being rebuilt after the Grenfell Tower block fire in west London last summer.
"Bohemian Rhapsody" trailer rocks Queen fansThe movie about the life & times of Queen and Freddie Mercury doesn't come out until the autumn, but the fans are being worked into a fever pitch with this teaser.
Stormtroopers provide security for Solo: A Star Wars StorySecurity was even tighter than usual at the Cannes Film Festival on Tuesday as a phalanx of stormtroopers ensured the cast of "Solo: A Star Wars Story" made it safely up the red carpet.
Auction of Prince memorabilia delights fans"It would be amazing to have a piece of him," says one fan.
Spike Lee's 'BlacKkKlansman' debuts to standing ovation at Cannes
Cannes Film Festival is more serious this year
Spike Lee's "BlacKkKlansman" gets Cannes ovationLee's new movie, based on a true story, wowed the audience at Cannes for its premiere, and puts the American director, not seen at the festival for nearly three decades, in prime position for a prize, and maybe even the Palme d'Or.
Prince Harry's evolving, and at times testy, relationship with the press
Supermodels walk the walk for  'Fashion Relief'British supermodel Naomi Campbell has hosted her latest charity "Fashion for Relief" show in Cannes.
Diamonds on Cannes' red carpetLiving it goes behind the scenes to discover how celebrities get to wear the most dazzling diamonds at Cannes Film Festival 2018
82 women walk the red carpet in Cannes film festival protest
Climbing the red carpet at the Cannes Film Festival
TV star Joelle and the growing business of beauty in the Middle EastThis week Inspire Middle East goes beneath the surface of the region’s cosmetics industry.
Banned Kenyan film screened at Cannes'Rafiki', a girl-meets-girl romance screening at Cannes, will not be shown in Kenya, where it has been banned
Interview with Ellen Von Unwerth at the Opera GalleryClaudia Schiffer, Naomi Campbell, Kate Moss, Rhianna, Lady Gaga. “I shot them all”.
Palestine and Saudi Arabia make debuts at Cannes marketplaceFor the first time, Palestinian filmmakers have an official business presence at Cannes
Tarmac, pallets, tarmac, coffee, tarmac, beach: we shared the life of a truck driverLife in a cab: our journalist spent 9 days trucking across Europe to uncover the human price of road transportation.
Empty chair at Cannes for detained Russian rock biopic directorThere was an empty chair at a Cannes news conference on Thursday for Russian film director Kirill Serebrennikov, under house arrest back home in a fraud case his producer called "ridiculous".
Polanski threatens to sue Oscars Academy
Royal wedding: The people trying to cash in
Cannes honours Scorsese as festival rewards contribution to cinemaThe American director of "Taxi Driver", (Palme d'Or 1974), is given a standing ovation receiving the Directors' Fortnight award.
The technology behind the films at CannesEuronews' reporter Belle Donati sees that behind the sun-kissed facades of the Cannes Film Festival the old ways in movieworld are under serious threat from new technologies. While they could mean trouble ahead for the industry, others see the remarkable opportunities they bring.
Laser research in Europe set to revolutionise our lives!
Gilliam's 'Quixote' heads to CannesThe film has been dogged by disaster since Gilliam first decided to bring Cervante's      novel to the big screen 20 years ago
Can Cannes Film Festival adapt to changing times?
Cannes Film Festival kicks off with Spanish drama 'Everybody Knows'Actress Cate Blanchett led the way up the red carpet in Cannes on Tuesday as the film festival's rare majority-female jury opened the 71st movie festival.
Stormy lawyer says Russian oligarch put $500K in Michael Cohen account
Hawaii resident goes home to find spewing lavaKeith Brock, a resident of Hawaii's Leilani Estates which has been engulfed by lava, returned home to collect his belongings on Sunday (May 6) to find spewing, red lava outside his backyard.
New York Attorney General resigns over allegations of assaultEric Schneiderman denies he used violent behaviour towards four women
Cannes Film Festival director defends 'bold' selectionActress Cate Blanchett is heading this year's jury for the famous Cannes Film festival which opened its doors on Monday.
Critics have said the panel, which also includes, Kristen Stewart and Lea Seydoux has more A-list acting talent than the films set to be shown.
Timelapse video captures lava flowing from Hawaii's Kilauea Volcano
Dublin's best spots to visit during a business tripA Living it guide to mixing the best of business and pleasure in Dublin, Ireland.
Stormy Daniels calls for Trump's resignation in 'SNL' skit
Glimmer of hope for man stuck at airport for nearly two monthsAs he grapples with his own ordeal, he says Syrians are paying the price for a war they have "nothing to do with."
Donald Trump contradicts lawyer amid Stormy Daniels affair
Basque in gloryDiscovering the beauty of Saint-Jean-de-Luz
How will hyperspeed and AI tech shake up the Middle East?This week’s Inspire Middle East goes high-tech as we focus on the big and small innovations that will be impacting tomorrow’s world.
Oscars film academy expels Cosby and Polanski
Trump denies using campaign funds to pay off Stormy Daniels
Racist trolls hacked a NASA competition to stop black teen girls from winningNASA quickly shut down efforts by trolls to "attack a particular student team based on their race" and "manipulate the vote."
The Eusebio legend revealed in new movie "Ruth"The prodigy's early days were far from straightforward, and his contested transfer from Mozambique to Portugal became a bitter struggle between rivals Benfica and Sporting Lisbon.
As it happened this morning: Friday 4th May
A wind of change in Iranian cinemaThe 36th Fajr International Film Festival in Tehran showcased an international selection of films in the presence of guests from around the globe
Watch: Minimum alcohol pricing in Scotland
Full acquittal only fair result in Spain 'Wolf Pack' trial, says defendants' lawyer
Avengers: Infinity War breaks worldwide box office record
Watch: Tesla driver ‘puts on autopilot and moves to passenger seat’
Spanish law not the problem in ‘Wolf Pack’ case, says victim’s lawyer
Thousands demonstrate after Spain's 'Wolf Pack' trial
Jewellers polish up Cannes festival's top prizeJewellers in Switzerland work together to polish up one of the world's most coveted prize in cinema; the Palme d'Or.
9-year sentence for ‘wolf pack’ sex assailants sparks outrage in Spain
Foreign influence taking over Bosnia and Herzegovina?
Ken Loach in anti-Semitism clash with Belgium's prime ministerMichel criticises honorary doctorate for director
Photographer João Bernardino’s draw to utilitarian and industrial infrastructure: our conversationPassionate about old industrial infrastructure and vehicles, João Bernardino (@joao.bernardino) is European Lens’ second featured photographer.
Kippa solidarity in GermanyDemonstrations follow viral video of an attack on a man wearing the Jewish cap
Spain: more woe for Rajoy as Madrid head quits over shoplifting video
Daniel Auteuil's fourth film behind the camera: "Amoureux de ma femme""The lovers of my wife" is a new adaptation of Florian Zeller's play which focuses on the feelings of love, desire and jealousy
Kidnapped Mexican students were killed, dissolved in acid police say
German student invents own languageFrom Klingon to Dothraki, invented languages have gained popularity in recent years. One German student has created his own language called Garadálava — and he tells Euronews how it’s done.
36th Fajr International Film Festival kicks off in Tehran
Court fines Scottish man over 'grossly offensive' Nazi dog video
Russians protest Moscow's Telegram ban with paper planes
Will Jafar Panahi attend Cannes Film Festival?
Mini-Me actor Verne Troyer dies at 49
Nicaragua journalist shot dead covering unrest live on Facebook
Natalie Portman snubs 'Jewish Nobel'Israel's culture minister said Portman had  "fallen like a ripe fruit" into the hands of supporters of the boycott, divestment and sanctions movement.
360º Skiing on the snowy mountain tops of La GraveIt’s almost the end of ski season, which was marked by an exceptional volume of snow.
Ex-cycling star Armstrong settles $100m doping fraud lawsuitBut the disgraced former champion will only pay a fraction of the amount sought in a lawsuit brought by fellow cyclist Floyd Landis and the US government
Suspect in Berlin anti-Semitism convicted to four weeks' detentionA 19-year-old suspect in Berlin's most recent anti-Semitism attack was convicted to four weeks' juvenile detention.
Women beaten up in Iran for wearing headscarf 'improperly'Video prompts investigation by interior ministry.
Man convicted of Iceland's biggest heist escapes prison, lands in SwedenSindri Thor Steffanson managed to escape to Sweden on an Icelandair flight also carrying the prime minister
Cinema opens in Saudi Arabia, ending decades-old ban
Streaming giant Netflix reveals new European seriesNetflix has unveiled several new series based in Europe, including its first from the Netherlands.
Watch: Chaos in Nigerian Senate as 'hoodlums' steal mace in packed chamberThree men have been filmed bursting into a packed Senate in Nigeria and stealing a symbolic mace.
Inside the US government agency designing tech to fight fake newsThe team that brought you driverless cars and Siri is now fighting a new kind of war on information.
Hugo Pratt exhibition opens in LyonThe creator of Corto Maltese has his work honored
Trapped farm animals die in Spanish floodsAccording to Spanish media, more than a thousand pigs were trapped in their pens during strong floods in northeastern Spain.
Cate Blanchett heads up a starry female-dominated jury at the 71st Cannes film festival
Barbara Bush remembered as champion of family and literacy
Starbucks to close 8,000 US cafés for an afternoon’s racial bias trainingThe move by the world’s biggest coffee company follows the arrest of two black men at a Philadelphia café last week.
Watch: men caught tearing down abortion posters in IrelandMen have been filmed tearing down posters related to May's abortion referendum.
Europe's journalists continue work of murdered Malta blogger Daphne Caruana GaliziaToday is six months since Malta investigative reporter Daphne Caruana Galizia was killed by a car bomb just metres from her home. A group of investigative journalists from across Europe have used the anniversary to announce they intend to continue her work.
Full Metal Jacket star diesEx-marine spotted by Kubrick after being hired as a technical adviser.
Italian film director Vittorio Taviani dies at 88Alongside his brother Paolo, Taviani made more than 20 films including "Padre Padrone", which took top honors at the 1977 Cannes film festival and Docudrama Caesar Must Die won the Golden Bear prize at the Berlin Film Festival in 2012.
Film director Milos Forman dies
James Comey: In his own wordsPresident Trump beware! Former FBI director Comey is doing a series of media interviews before the release of his book, "A Higher Loyalty: Truth, Lies and Leadership"
The Culture Summit: Art as an agent of social changeAward-winning British photojournalist Jimmy Nelson takes us on a journey to the hidden corners of the world, putting indigenous communities into perspective through his camera lens at the Culture Summit Abu Dhabi. We also master martial arts with a real-life Power Ranger at Middle East Comic Con.
Eurovision act to sing in 34 languages
Full Cannes Film Festival lineup announcedAll eyes are on Paris as the lineup of the 71st Cannes Film Festival is being unveiled during a live press conference from the Champs-Elysees.
No Netflix films at the Canne Film Festival in May
Spanish rappers 'defend freedom of expression' with new music video
New film shines a light on the Nazi occupation of the Channel Islands off the coast of Normandy.Lily James stars in "The Guernsey Literary and Potato Peel Pie Society."
Syria 'chemical attack': What we know so far
Queen dislikes helicopters — they remind her of US presidential visits
Deadpool actor charged over false bomb threatAmerican actor TJ Miller could face up to five years in prison if convicted, the FBI and Connecticut US District Attorney’s office said in a statement.
Portuguese film pays tribute to a WWI hero
Israel defence minister says sniper filmed shooting Palestinian ‘deserves medal’
FBI raids office of Trump's lawyer Michael Cohen
Russell Crowe's 'divorce' auction sells millions worth of movie propsThe auction at Sotheby's, 'The Art of Divorce' attracted dozens of buyers and spectators and reaped in more than $208 million dollars in Sydney.
Israeli-Gaza protests: Palestinian journalist killed by Israeli fire
Donald Trump 'unaware' of $130k payment to adult film star Stormy DanielsUS president rejects claims his lawyer paid her money to keep quiet about a sexual encounter between them
Terry Gilliam on directing Berlioz opera
Passengers of Paris suburban line enter train through windowsPassengers of a Parisian suburban train line had to enter the train car through windows on Tuesday, the first day of a 3-month long strike in the railway sector.
One of Bollywood's biggest stars was just sentenced to five years in prisonKhan, 52, has starred in more than 90 Hindi-language films, but also has had brushes with the law.
First cinema in over 35 years to open in Saudi ArabiaAMC plans to open 40 cinemas across the country over the next five years. The cinemas will not be gender segregated
Spanish language film to open Cannes Film Festival 2018
Paris passengers climb through train windows on first day of French rail strikePassengers at Paris' Gare de Lyon scrambled through the windows of a train as it stood on the platform on the first day of rolling national rail strikes.
Your World War I mission: 'Quicken the Americans' enthusiasm for the war!'Euronews' Alasdair Sandford tells the story of one British army officer sent to the US in April 1918 to recount his experiences from WWI, part of a drive to raise funds via the 'Liberty Loans' campaign. This soldier was Alasdair's grandfather.
Cannes film festival bans red carpet selfies
Cinema: Silence can kill you in John Krasinski's new film "A Quiet Place"Krasinski directs and plays alongside his real-life wife, Emily Blunt
Kubrick's '2001: A Space Odyssey' re-releasedWarner Bros says the re-release is a close to Kubrick's  original vision as possible with no digital tricks or remastered effects
Train in the U.S slams into a truck stuck on a crossingThe drivers of both vehicles managed to escape unhurt.
Frank Oz relives television gold in Muppet guys talkingThe legendary film director gathers a group of Muppet Show performers to talk about their lives, times and the leadership of Jim Henson
Saatchi showcases contemporary artists you should but don’t know yet
EU makes borderless streaming of TV, movies a realityPay-to-view subscribers will now be able to follow their shows when abroad, but Hollywood may need some persuading the new EU law is good for business.
Thousands witness Hawking's funeral procession in Cambridge
Picture Perfect: Exploring creative minds at Art DubaiEgyptian-Swiss artist Karim Noureldin takes us on a creative journey through his modern textile installations which were on display at this year’s Art Dubai. We also examine the emerging Arab art genre of satirical cartooning in Jordan.
Why Mary Poppins is banned in Germany on Good Friday
Photographer Jorge Alva's cinematic eye for symmetry: our conversationPassionate about fine lines, patterns and symmetry, Jorge Alva (@urbanentdecker_) is European Lens' first featured photographer.
German cinemas banned from screening 700 films on Good FridayWhat kind of film do you want to watch on Good Friday? In Germany your options are limited.
Brits won't be able to access UK Netflix in EU after BrexitAs of the withdrawal date, UK citizens won't be able to benefit from their digital subscriptions, like BBC iPlayer and their UK Netflix catalogue, when travelling in the EU.
Funerals underway for victims of Siberian shopping mall fireThe incident has roused public anger over official corruption
'We were defrauded': Ex-Weinstein assistant testifies to ParliamentZelda Perkins worked for Miramax studios in London.
Hundreds attend funeral for three killed in Kemerovo mall fireHundreds of mourners attended a funeral service on Wednesday for two school-age children and their grandmother killed in the deadly shopping mall fire in Kemerovo.
Japonismes 2018: Paris soon under the spell of Japan's visual artsGet a sneak peek at Japonismes 2018, an eagerly-anticipated cultural landmark this summer in Paris with over 50 events dedicated to Japanese culture.
Spielberg's Ready Player OneThe director says his latest film harks back to his earlier blockbusters
Does Cynthia Nixon have a shot? Maybe — if she channels Reagan | View
Burt Reynolds plays "The Last Movie Star"Art mirrors life in Burt Reynold's latest big screen role. The 82-year-old plays an aging former movie actor whose best days are behind him, forcing him to contemplate whether not he really was a true star.
Five things Stormy Daniels said about her alleged affair with Trump
Stormy Daniels says she was threatened in 2011 over Trump storyThe adult film star said that the threat left her "rattled" but that she didn't go to the police because she was scared.
Puppets from "Isle of Dogs" go on display in LondonAn exhibition presenting the puppets and the set of "Isle of Dogs", the latest film of U.S. director Wes Anderson, opened on Friday (March 23) in London.
The Euronews interview that is key to the investigation into Nicolas S
Bill Murray: The Parkland kids remind me of those who protested VietnamTheir most powerful asset in their fight to bring change is their idealism
Three women with legal actions against Trump. Who poses the greatest danger?Stormy Daniels, Karen McDougal and Summer Zervos are all in court vs. Trump. One of the cases is different — a bigger problem for the president.
